I’m Forever Blowing Bubbles is a relic of the old custom of community singing at football matches – formal, organized singalongs before kick off. The fingerprints of this era can still be seen right across the land. At Birmingham City, for example, the fans sing Harry Lauder’s Keep Right On To The End Of The Road; at Bristol Rovers the old
Thank you for joining me on this journey.
Even though more studies are needed to verify the results, it could provide promise for omega-3 fatty acids as a preventative treatment option for a wide range of heart-related conditions.
Chris is wading in and looking to engage, and Brian is obliging him. Now, Brian goes for the take down and gets it.
Hello & Happy Friday!
American Apparel high waist pleated pants
I’m Shadonna, author of An Unexpected Bride, a romantic comedy about Emma Wiggins who is about to marry her heart-stopping, gorgeous boss, CEO Evan Fletcher in seven days. Only he doesn’t know about it yet! Since An Unexpected Bride centers around the theme of weddings, I thought I’d make a fun list, based on research and funny wedding videos I’ve seen.
Oh and we don't have something to leave for that one either.
From now on .. I will learn how to help my daughter in study to pass her exams … I was thinking yesterday … of all the exams that I passed and didn’t passed ( I mean her in the educational road) and a deeper time and thinking was while I was flash back all the exams I have faced in my life … why did I ever gave some “situation or steps of my life” the determination of “tests of life” ..and how difficult or easy was some .. than others …
Mountain. (mowwn-tin)
I believe that a lot of people focus on the business relationships in their lives but can that be converted into personal relationships? Yes.
VIVIENNE: The Beyonders by Brandon Mull. My children and I read it together. It was a lot of fun and we look forward to reading the second book when it comes out later this month.
cool huh, then I add my personal touch
The company I worked for back in Chicago was among those called on by Halliburton and others as subcontractors in Iraq, and you know what? The package they offer you is pretty sweet. 2.5 times your base salary plus combat pay, generous vacation time, and you only had to sign a 6-12 month contract. I'd have been getting paid almost $100,000 as a project assistant/glorified admin. I gnawed hard on this and finally decided that, you know, we made the mess, we should go over there and fix it.
And finally:
I don't know what it is about that character (maybe that he's pretty old-fashioned and low-tech himself), but writing him goes quicker when I break out my trusty old fountain pen and a thick blank book.
We discussed various strategies such as taking a deep breath, identifying the size of the problem and matching the reaction to the problem and using self talk to remind yourself to take a break and not have a strong reaction. We practiced putting our upset energy in to our body by tightening our muscles and then relaxing them as a technique to calm our bodies down.
Cook's Illustrated
The Crowood Press, 1988, Hardback in dust wrapper.
I tied little bows on all my dreidels (little spinning tops used by children for a traditional game at Hanukkah), using coordinating twine colors.
My inspiration for this blog comes from my belief that the personality trait of introversion is sadly undervalued in a world that idolizes the extraverted - the out-spoken social butterflies, the showy peacocks, and the vocal leaders of this world. It’s not fair, and its not right. The mental acuity of the introvert has been honed to perfection through years of introspection, vivid imagination, and endless daydreaming. It is the well-nourished creative mind of the introvert that peers inward and envisions the possibilities in things that others may ignore or cannot see.
In the US the Conglomerate cornered the market on production and they eventually became the government. Soames (the tablet) eventually became the only excepted form of currency. However, there is a fly in the ointment and the fly is named Reinhold Borsten. The Conglomerate has learned that Borsten plans on dumping a chemical in to the global cloud cover that will neutralize all the radioactivity in the clouds, essentially solving the global radiated water supply.
Ah yes, 'bathroom portraits' are a part of my life again now that I'm back living in halls. This weekend I made the most of the President's Holiday by spending 3 days in Brooklyn. It was so lovely and as much as I'm enjoying living in Amherst, it made me realise how much I'm missing city life.
2/3 cup (packed) light brown sugar
Now everyone who is older then I, will say something along the lines that life is still young...and I totally agree! It is and I am excited for my future!
Kevin does admit to having sex with Christine, but he says she asked him to pretend to rape her. It seems like an absurd excuse at first, but apparently Christine knew Boyd was coming home and wanted her husband to see the crime happen so she and Kevin could go have fun- as they’d already been doing for a while. Christine, unsurprisingly, is outraged by this accusation, but there are too many holes in her story for it to continue to be convincing.
Pack of small paper cups
I had a little inspiration lunch time and I mixed spreadable cheese with some chopped cranberries, spreading this on crackers and it was delicious so that is my picture for today
I came by Him fucking me on the edge of the bed and Him rubbing my clit. We both came together which is wonderful when it happens.
She now has her own channel, where she posts videos about make-up, hair, outfits, etc.
Exposure Compensation -1 1/3
We talk about Christ’s power to overcome all things, we attest to the miraculous strength of Jesus to raise the dead, heal the sick and turn water into wine without much hesitation, but it’s a much more complex issue for us to consider Him actually changing me…. We see and feel all the weight of our chronic and scarred unhealthy lives that make up our collective and broken modern-day manifestation of the church. We quote famous passages of scripture that focus on God’s ability and desire to “heal the broken-hearted, and set captives free”, but we struggle with the reality of what that might mean for today, for ”US”.
Anders Behring Breivik loses front-page power in Norway, published Friday, provides a hint why: Silje Gloppen, a teacher, said however abhorrent Breivik's views, lessons needed to be learned from him. "Norwegians and, I believe, the rest of the world have to consider the possibility that this man is speaking the truth when he says he believes our 'Norwegian culture and ethnicity' is threatened by multiculturalism," she said.
Dr. William Rea has written “chemically sensitive patients can — and do — die in hospitals from exposure to chemicals but it is always blamed on organ failure or recurrent infection,” and ME/CFS patient Sophia Mirza died after a serious decline prompted by a hospital stay. Read more>>
It’s a bleak, nasty world she’s living in. Meade’s story is gripping and stunning in its dark intensity. Hampton-Jones’s biog tells that she has some experience in the fashion industry in Europe before moving back to the States, so she’s talking about what she knows – not a world I’d be happy in, but I was drawn into it briefly while reading this novel. The novel is that dark that even while you’re desperate to get Meade into rehab and away from the world she’s chosen, you walk the path with her for the duration. It was almost a relief to finish but, boy, it was a great read. (10/10)
The virus is present in the most aggressive types of prostate cancer. Right now, we take a “watch and wait” attitude because we don’t know in which person the cancer will kill them, and in which the cancer will be controlled by the immune system.
The problem the Prime Minister faces in this instance is that there is barely a British citizen left who believes his account of the relationship he enjoyed with Newscorp and its senior executives. He refused to give a straight answer to the ‘Christmas lunch’ questions…and his reluctance is now explained in the worst possible way. He refused to damn Andy Coulson…and is now seen to have defended the indefensible. He blithely suggests that he and Rebekah Brooks were not close….omitting to mention that he and Mrs Cameron once left their late son on a beach in the sole care of that woman. He insists that there was no ‘quid pro quo’ between Newscorp support for the Conservative Party in 201o….but is then discovered to have discussed that support with James Murdoch, to have fired Vince Cable for his opinion about Murdoch (now entirely vindicated); to have replaced him with a man whose own website hailed Rupert Murdoch as a genius; but when that replacement’s impropriety comes to light, he defends him to the hilt…rather than firing him.
KUALA LUMPUR: Amendments to the Printing Presses and Publications Act (PPPA) 1984 fall short of reforms promised by the government as the section on publishing false news remains, said DAP secretary-general Lim
Ron's '78-79 card lists him as a Pittsburgh Penguin, but he played his entire career with the New York Rangers, all the way through the 1989-90 season. He never played a single NHL game with any other franchise, the Penguins included. Was this just an error? Anyone know?
I had a few doubts about the surgery, but I’m glad we did go through with hit. The Dr. said that there was a significant lesion beneath the nail, and if we’d let it go, it probably would’ve become infected at some point. From what I understand, foot infections are really horrible to get rid of, so for the few hours of craziness we faced today, we’ll save Anna lots of grief later. I’m glad we went this route even if it means my child will be without a big toe nail for a while. Thankfully, it’s winter, so no one will ever know!
I have no followers; cause my followers have to read my definitions for what I mean by honour, and they have to be very crystal clear about what I demand of a follower: I ain't interested in no ignorant schmuck who thinks they can pretend to join a ideology of 'honour' and 'personal responsibility' without knowing what is going to be required of them to do so. So they got to inform themselves.
I conclude that people create their own images to bear in mind, not because they are strong, but because they are weak, insecure, and cowardly. Because much courage is needed to face a blank page every day and allow yourself to write brand new things on it, allow the beauty of the world to leave it’s mark on it, to not always refer to yesterday as a reason to be respected and loved today! To not always refer to what you saw of yourself yesterday, but to allow you to see yourself as brand new, every day!
the grandest is exquisite.
After glueing my heart to the center of the card,
Suffering is not my fate.
On Sunday morning (his 6th birthday) he said, "Mommy, I'm done sucking my thumb." I was so proud of him. He made it through the entire day.
Does this mean that we have an abundance of lawyers with legs dangling under mahogany desks, sitting proudly below their framed document from Stanford or Seminole County Night Law School dreaming up lawsuits?
They all enjoyed the party and asked to do it again with other countries. It really makes my heart skip a beat to see teens so happy and having fun at the library. We are in desperate need of a new library that has more teen friendly space, so we try to do all we can to make things special for them.
This is the NHS that I joined as a Junior Doctor 36 years ago.
I'm not crazy about Gogol's music, but I can appreciate the unique genre and the immense amount of energy put forth. He's pretty careless, tossing his guitar behind him with no one to catch it, or spraying a practically full bottle of red wine on the first few rows of the crowd. The sound was a bit bass heavy for this show, but the tape still sounds alright. If you have really high end, broad frequency range headphones, you might hear a faint buzz in between songs. This is due to being under the neon sign of the venue.
During the pandemonium in yesterday’s events, several journalists were attacked by police officers. Some photographers even saw their cameras and memory cards destroyed after they were seen taking photos of alleged police brutality.
It wasn’t easy work, and there were a few times when the stress of it all made me lose sleep. But I tried, as hard as I could. I was at both set construction days, I helped compile the prop list, I direct the spots every performance, and I’ve tried to keep everything running on time like it should.
Nothing can beat, when you ride more than 100 kms in one go.
Britain, wellspring of the industrial revolution, is the chief proof of this theory. Small medieval differences in the absolutism of English and Spanish monarchs were amplified by historical chance. When European exploration began, Britain’s more constrained crown left trade in the hands of privateers, whereas Spain favoured state control of ocean commerce. The New World’s riches solidified Spanish tyranny but nurtured a merchant elite in Britain. Its members helped to tilt the scales against monarchy in the Glorious Revolution of 1688 and counterbalanced the landed aristocracy, securing pluralism and sowing the seeds of economic growth. Within a system robust enough to tolerate creative destruction, British ingenuity (not so different from French or Chinese inventiveness) was free to flourish.
We fell into a contemplative silence, and after a minute I started searching on Google Images for a woman's face -- not the glamorized magazine type, but the real self-taken kind -- reflected back too closely in a vanity mirror.
Winston-Salem, NC 27106
“I-I can’t Jack, I c-can’t get up,” I cry looking up at him, trying to reason with him with my eyes. Trying to find some part of the old Jack in them, the one I fell in love with.
It is narrated in the book Sahih AlBukhari, Allah’s Messenger (pbuh) said:
The article is analyzed in a blogpost titled “Chafe’s Embarrassment” by KC Johnson and in another titled “Juxtapositional Fallacies” by Duke professor Michael Gustafson, who writes:
7) I have a lot of problems with my knees and ankles as a result of being hit by a car some years ago(which put an end to my aspirations to be a ballet dancer).
SO, they had a call to make a Christmas card using non-traditional Christmas product. I wasn't sure exactly what they meant by that so I made one card using a beach theme! I thought it was pretty cute! Ha! Here it is:
Preheat the oven to 325F.
I followed the second method while assembling simply because my soup bowls were not oven safe.
Juliet, the dice was loaded from the start
We love guns in the west but we love highways even more. And since Salt Lake City, the hub of economic activity in the state, has a relatively small core, we have many people who commute to the city from both the north and the south. Indeed, Davis county to the north, is known as the bedroom of Salt Lake. It is connected to city by Interstate 15 which is used by so many commuters that, despite being widened any number of times, was deemed inadequate, and the powers that be at the time determined that the freeway should be duplicated with another one running parallel to it. Again the activists went into action. As many of you know, the Salt Lake Valley, running a hundred miles from Ogden in the north to Provo in the south, is located between the Wasatch Mountains on the east and the Great Salt Lake on the West. The foothills on the east side of the valley for the whole hundred miles were filled with homes so there was no possibility of a duplicate freeway to the east. That left the wetlands of the lakeshore that were largely undeveloped exactly because they were wetlands and subject to almost annual flooding and, in part, protected. But it was the only place a road could be built and it was going to happen come hell or high water. Cyclists, in fact, by riding north and south on the little roads that did exist were noticing that construction was going on even during the litigation. In face of this mitigation and the fact that the road was going to happen, the extraction of concessions became the objective of the activists’ battle. Without reciting the whole list of concessions, most of which I know nothing about, just let me say that for us the most important was the inclusion of the bike path. And to help sell the idea of an additional freeway, they called it a “parkway” and that definition included the bike path, a fifty-five mile speed limit and the promise of no construction on the wetlands west of the highway. I have serious doubts about how serious they are about not building west of the roadway but the bike path is there and no semis and a reasonable speed limit make for pleasant biking even where the path is just feet from the road.
I am thankful for so many things this year. Way too many to list while I have a turkey to bake! I hope everyone (well, I guess only my American friends) has a wonderful Thanksgiving. And to those not celebrating, I hope you have a wonderful day as well.
"Oh. It's just low on batteries."
I AM winter gardening. Soil prep. Yep, NEXT year I'm going to have the BEST GD tomatoes ever!!!
One of the bloodiest, and perhaps most significant race riots of this nation’s history was the Tulsa, Race Riot of 1921 in Oklahoma. Its importance stems not from its resultant death toll, but from its shroud of mystery. Shortly after the bloody massacre, history closed its mouth and attempted to erase memory of the ugly event.
In a press release from the director of the movie, Vivid Entertainment’s B. Skow, he said: “Any time three women get together to talk about the same guy, the results are going to be more than interesting. Now, when these women also happen to be adult stars that have sex for a living, and reveal they have been with the same guy, you can be sure they’ll share absolutely everything.”
"The Work Horse"
Apparently I have sat behind the wheel before.
“(The BN government) knows that they will go down in the next general election, so they will engage in more cheating. So we need to join Bersih, clean the electoral roll, use indelible ink, demand fair and free access to media, stop corruption and stop dirty politics,” the PKR Youth vice chief said.
Raju
Me: "Just how much I love you."
Who stand at the front against any and all,
Anti-slavery campaigner IRA has accused an accountant working in the Mauritanian embassy in Paris of having brought a young enslaved girl into the country. The allegations have been denied and IRA suggests the girl may have been trafficked out of France.
Back facts: Darold Knowles, Bob Locker and Manny Trillo are all listed on the Cubs checklist although none played for the team in '74. All are airbrushed into Cubs caps.
Clearly I’m not a big-time fashionista in any sense of the word.
(Or something like that)
They came and went to her and she was awake and talking to them and asking where their dad was. Perfectly lucid. This all had to be a bad dream.
What a quote, I love it! It reminds me of:
not adjusting my food intake, not making good choices on what i did eat....
The petitioner through a letter on December 28 offered to purchase all rights owned by PTV for US$30 million and further offered US$16 million for revenue sharing agreement.
9. The Angel Experiment by James Patterson
In case you actively ensure these five errors don’t creep in to your content, you are going to definitely have a much more efficient marketing approach. Just don’t forget that the content is there for everyone’s benefit, and not only your own. Being generous with facts and guidance is going to be appreciated and do not be scared to go the further mile in giving your reader’s what they desire.
993 ***D-X/30/1987. “The Constitution of 1787 and the Confederate States of America.” Lenoir-Rhyne College, Hickory, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item B-6, above, pp. 125-34, 429-31 (1995).)
A crow harasses a very patient red-tailed hawk high up against the flat sky before a storm.
So my tuppence worth at this stage, which might be interesting to research, is that the overall birth rate has held up despite family sizes reducing because there are more families. There are more marriages and co-habiting couples as a proportion of total family units than previously. So fewer bachelors and spinsters, but that theory needs more research. What I can say here is that our marriage rate has stayed the same since the 1960s as revealed in these Eurostat numbers, and we still have 5-6 marriages per 1000 of population per year (5.2 in 2009, 5.5 in 1960) but I can’t find figures on co-habiting couples which might have been frowned upon in the 1960s but seems quite acceptable today, and figures from 2009 suggested that 33.3% of all births were outside wedlock which was most certainly frowned upon in decades past. In Greece just 7% of births are outside wedlock though in Iceland it is 65%, the EU average is 37%.
In America there have been two cases similar to the Mary Ann Leneghan atrocity. Both involved gangs of blacks raping, torturing and murdering whites. They have been dubbed the Wichita Massacre and the Knoxville Horror. I mention these American cases simply to highlight the warped and perverse attitude of the British MSM.
We even got a little work done around the house including hanging new blinds, adding towel hooks and tp holders to the bathrooms, and getting a few pictures on the walls.
So it works, he said.
The DJ on the radio announces a new song –
team of knights, centuries old—the Royal Order of the
“And now you got the insurance money and are going to see how much it would cost to replace the tree, right? Hmmm?”
They had an amazing selection of various colour checked ones as well...
Dill's mom wanted Bubby's trip to be a total surprise, but I know Bubby, and if she were to suddenly find out she was going to be six hours away from her parents for half a week, she'd flip out. And not in a good way. So she knows she's going on a trip to a far away place with Grandma and Papa, and she's going to stay in a hotel and go to "a magical place where you walk a lot." I can't believe she hasn't figured it out yet. Ah, to be four years old again.
So I want some emotional reserves for this stuff. I know I can't always have enough for all of it, but for next week, I need more.
Do you remember the last time you got sick? How did you know if you needed to see a doctor? What care did he offer? Was there a way for you to take care of it on your own? Could you have prevented it?
It's only August and I already want the spice of fall. It's a relatively cool day today...cooler than it has been. I was instantly refreshed when I walked outside and I felt the coolness in the air. I'm dreaming of that season. Aside from the amazing flavors, fall is truly magical in Minnesota. You can hear the crunchy leaves rustling on the sidewalk as they are caught by a sudden breeze. You can feel the fresh, cool air combined with the warmth of the sun, and you can see the amazing colors that are portrayed in the trees.
In contrast track and field can only guarantee it’s stars will be on display at the Olympics or World Championships! We can’t even guarantee attendance at our National Championships unless spots to a major championship are on the line! THAT is a major problem – a problem that the sport MUST address. Track cries about not being able to attract dollars, yet all you have to do is take a look at any of the sports mentioned to see that there is lots of money out there being spent on sports in the way of advertising and sponsorship. The issue is being able to guarantee that the money gets and adequate “return”.
My second sneak peek features the Daisy Bouquet petite stamp set, the second in a series of floral bouquets (Spring Tulips released in March was the first floral bouquet set). I started with Jen's Deconstructed Sketch #38 for the layout. I stamped the image onto Choice Buttercream cardstock with Memento Tuxedo Black ink and colored it with Copics (V04, V05, V09, YG93, YG95, YR14, YR18, BG32, BG34, R81, R83) to coordinate with the Basic Grey Indie Bloom patterned papers. I thought the bright colors would be perfect to make a card for a wedding we're attending in June. After coloring the image I airbrushed the background with Copic and popped up the circle with foam tape. There are four mini sentiments in the Daisy Bouquet set that coordinate with the Mini Tags die set, also new for this release. I cut out the tag, stamped the 'best wishes' sentiment on it, and adhered it with an orange glitter brad. I love how this card turned out bright, happy, and sunny! Here's a look at the Mini Tags set of dies:
So I had this whole post written last night. I just dashed it off and was ready to post it in 5 minutes. But really, it was 5 minutes of brilliance.
Mothers, your teenage children also need that same kind of love and attention. It seems easier for many mothers and fathers to express and show their love to their children when they are young, but more difficult when they are older. Work at this prayerfully. There need be no generation gap. And the key is love. Our young people need love and attention, not indulgence. They need empathy and understanding, not indifference from mothers and fathers. They need the parents’ time. A mother’s kindly teachings and her love for and confidence in a teenage son or daughter can literally save them from a wicked world.
CallyAnn says "I am a SAHM of 4 and have been scrapping for 16 years plus! I love all styles and colors and I am a Ribbon Hoarder! I admit it! I love scrapping to take my mind off all the yucky stuff! Its my get away from stress! Hope you like my project!"
This comes from too-slovenly dusting of too-tightly packed bookshelves….
My diy backyard project is nearly done. (I should have pictures next week) but my boring backyard needed a little sprucing up so I spend an entire saturday with my wonderful husband planting bushes and pulling weeds. I can't tell you how rocky the ground was--it was not fun (and I really couldn't do it so my husband did most of the digging( but I'm glad the yard looks better now. The only thing that is still on my mind now is our wooden staircase which leads me into my focus for today's post, Flood® Wood Care, the wood care specialist.
But then we get into the argument of , “If God chooses, who is blame? Who can resist His will?” We don’t get any more of an answer (p. 53). We aren’t going to understand this, any more than Tommy could understand why he fell in love with a 200-year-old beautiful Scottish virgin in a disappearing village. But he was meant to, and he knew that. Sometimes, all you can do is believe.
2037.E-V/14/1980. “Just ratify the Equal Rights Amendment and be done with it.” Hyde Park Herald, Chicago, Illinois, May 14, 1980, p. 4; Forest Leaves, River Forest, Illinois, May 14, 1980, p. 14; and other Illinois newspapers. See Item B-3, above, pp. 478-79 (1983).
I first discovered Cassandra Clare when a friend of mine gave me one of the books in The Mortal Instruments series. I devoured this (at the time) trilogy and thoroughly enjoyed the world that Clare had created. It is a world that exists within our own, but demons and supernatural creatures, such as faeries, also exist in the shadows outside the knowledge of mundanes (normal humans). In this world there is a race of people called Shadowhunters who have been tasked with sending the demons back to hell.
Eli sure knows how to take care of me. The boys got these little princess rings at the dentist and of course they can't wear them...Eli said, "I know why you like princesses. Because you are a girl and girls like princesses. Not boys. We hate them." He finds the rings laying around the house and promptly brings them back to me, "Mom, you forgot your princess ring."
This morning we all clean out Mom’s apartment at Sunrise. No need to prolong this painful job, especially since many hands are available to help today. After that? Then my new normal begins. Wonder what that will feel like.
All in all, it was a great night for me, with friends from both of my worlds of music and beer colliding to celebrate for the same cause. I think all parties were pleased with the turnout, and we played a pretty damn smokin' set for only having two short rehearsals prior to the gig. Thanks again to Chris at O'Reilly's and the Millbock crew for making us feel at home and making the event a success. Cheers!
I looked at the computer tonight and thought: oh my god, I have to write a post! I'm tired! I have two 12-hour days coming up! So I considered. Quickly. Today's giveaway is quick and easy, I'm having an Amy's tofu scramble for dinner, why not make the post itself quick and easy?
Snack was macadamia nuts.
If the lord is in debilitation, or in the sign of a planet who is his enemy – it is negative. You need to know about planetary friendship and enmity, of course, before you can figure out if a planet is in the house of a friend or an enemy.
And brown bread. Perfect, amazing bread with Kerrygold butter.
Please try this out and let me know if it works out well for you?
1 all--
Slot Loading DVD for Multiple Angle Mounting
Angel Fire by L.A. Weatherly
It never ceases to amaze me that you can turn something like a batch of rhubarb in the photo above into a beautiful pie. My pie doesn't look like it could be presented to a culinary school but it blessed those I love and really I'm just a stay at home mom who loves to cook and bake for my family. I promise you they're not worried about how "perfect" my pie appears.
Isn't it beautiful!? It's so so purty...
General Wei rolled his eyes when he first heard this news. Of course people were not allowed to leave! It was for their own good. The centers were safe. Everything a person could need was provided. Why would anyone want to leave? It was dangerous outside of the centers. Looters, marauders and bandits proliferated in the lawlessness that followed the crash in America.
to embody pure wickedness or Kerwin Mathews's uncanny way of
I have read some interesting interviews with people who take some very interesting and beautiful selfies. I enjoyed reading them and gleaned some useful information from them. One thing that stood out to me was that once I made myself a prop, rather than the object, of the picture, my pictures got better.
The call went like this:
Because I don't want Brian to read this and ever think that his sharing caused me pain that I myself cannot endure.
- Understand -
The rest of us while we are waiting for these people we can begin to talk to God, ask him for forgiveness, if you have failed your children in any way whatsoever and give you grace to fulfill your role as a parent onward. And if you have been doing your duty correctly; in a night like this, you should be thanking the Almighty that he has made you a very good parents, and many of us needs to thank God tonight, for the kind of parent God gave us, parents that helped us to become what we have become. So let’s spend some minute talking to the Lord.
Death can happen with sharpness and ferocity, or it can be slow and painful. It can just as well be peaceful and painless. It is different for everyone. If only we were to have the option, I’m sure that many would select the later.
If there’s a best place to hurt oneself, it’s a hospital so Crown Prince gets immediate care. When he comes to, he rushes off to find his precious crown princess who’s dressed nothing like her usual self and I’m wondering what he plans to say to her when it’s obvious she’s not the person he used to know. But I’ll give him a pass because he just hit his head and is obviously in love.
Database Design Highly desired 5 Years 2 – Proficient
We live in a different state, so we made our flight reservations in the first part of April, thinking that there is the possibility of being overdue... looking forward to flying up to spend 8 days with them.
U2 Pride (in the name of love) IRL
It doesn't always happen, but this one pleases me!
I can't remember if I mentioned this last week, but our ultrasound technician commented right away on how big the baby is. She thinks bugaboo is about a week ahead of my due date schedule growth-wise, which would put us closer to 14 weeks now. No due date change, but watch for a Halloween baby come fall!
Chester onderhandel vreeslik met die Fedex manne, maar dinge werk nie in Gambia so lekker nie. Die Gambia regering is baie streng oor die tipe van ding, en hulle laat nie vir Fedex toe om pakkies te “re-route” sonder dat die volledige naam en besonderhede van die ontvanger van die pakkie bewys kan word nie. Fedex vra vreeslik om verskoning, maar reëls is reëls.
“If the party fails in ensuring democracy and transparency, it is pointless for me to continue,” he told a press conference at the Parliament lobby yesterday.
that you could do differently today?
He put his hands on my waist and twirled me around trying to push me forward. I moved reluctantly, my feet dragging. "We're late... move it" he said.
Our intuitive abilities are imprinted in our DNA. We were born to instinctively understand how to protect ourselves, grow and connect with nature. A very easy example of your psychic ability is to remember how it feels when you “know” to get away from another person or situation. The Fight or Flight response is something most of us can agree that we have. We are sensitive to subtle energy because we are built from subtle energy. We take in loads of information all day long — media, facts, interactions with people, meals, you name it. And this information is filtered and will be stored correctly without much thought given to it. However, we have been conditioned to completely ignore the fact that each and every ounce of information we take in also has a vibratory frequency that is detected by our energy body, and deciphered through our pineal gland. “The seat of the soul” according to De Cartes. Our pineal glands are the functional, measurable, psychic part of us.
you see, this is still a learning process for me.
-starting playing 5nl with $50.
the sucker was hiding
an album in which the band was “getting back to Earth”
A queen is loved by all her subjects but she is concerned that her wobbly bottom will stop her subjects loving her and she is concerned that the people make fun of her. She tries a number of ways of remedying the situation including a beautician’s wobbly bottom cream, an inventor’s dewobbiliser, and a fitness instructors exercise programme. Even a poet creates poems but alas nothing works and all the creators are thrown in palace dungeon. The poet though, continues to write a nightly poem for the queen and a solution is discovered.
Mommy doesn’t know that I killed Sinbad.
Poor little boy was in SO much pain that first day! Luckily, he has his best buddy as his personal nurse! Chloe laid by him, fed him Cheerios, and helped comfort him. Such a lucky boy to have such a doting sister!
I’m sure when Laura was a little girl she never dreamed she would grow up and write a story about her life. For those of us mesmerized by her storytelling, aren’t we glad she did?
I'm thrilled to see so many of you getting in to the spirit of MIM too and sharing some blog love around.
One woman may consider being wined and dined the type of romance she desires from her mate. I on the other hand would love a spouse who does little things for me instead. I would prefer someone to take the garbage out for me everyday or show up at my work to give me a hug over flowers any day. I've already been married to the guy who will give you anything except love me the way I deserve. Or simply to know I'm appreciated would be a big step.
Now, there is probably a reason why I don’t have many “guy friends”. Deep down, I hold a resentment towards straight men, almost like a hardcore feminist (I never thought I would compare myself to a feminist, but there you have it). But wait a second! I’m not saying I hold this burning hatred towards all straight men, and I’m not bashing feminists. I’m just sharing something that I think a lot of gay men experience. To sidetrack, coming out happens in stages and phases that are different from person to person. There is that super secretive phase where nobody can know that you are gay. Then, if you were like me, there is the phase soon after where you tell everyone you come across that you’re gay and proud and leave rainbows in your path. These phases are natural for gay men and LGBT people in general, and I believe that resentment towards straight men is a natural phase as well. Think about it, It seems natural for gay men to picture straight men when they think of the word “homophobe” because typically, men are remembered as the bullies. I don’t think I’ve ever heard a story where a female was bullying the gay (male) student.
Today I'm wearing Beauty UK nail polish in 'Soft Grey'. I bought this as I was initially looking for the pale grey colour in the new Boots 17 Spring collection but unbeknownst to me it isn't out yet!!! Or if it is, my small Boots haven't got it!! So I left Boots and was having a browse round Superdrug when I spotted this little gem which was just the colour I was after. It was only £1.99 so a complete bargain!!
– The Dark Side Of The Moon, Alan Parsons Quad Mix (previously released only on vinyl LP/8 track tape in 1973) in high resolution audio at 640 kbps
But I can tell you this. For the first time in this WHOLE chunk of time, I can see how easy it might be to start making promises you just can't keep, so that you don't hurt anybody. Believe me, I am not making any rationalizations or excuses for what happened over there...I'm only telling those who have been here from the beginning that when you do this kind of thing, on this side of the fence, you are afforded a perspective that gives you insight that you would not believe.
My body is feeling so light and fresh, that it's hard to go to sleep at night. I don't have that drained feeling and my mind is still alert even though my body is signaling to get to bed. I think kicking up the workouts is going to help with this. We wanted to buy a wii fit today, but it appears that they are hard to find, so I took the dogs out for a long walk. I think I'll try a different yoga video tomorrow and see how the challenge goes.
So good and refreshing!! I am going to invite myself over to my friend MC’s house since she just got herself a juicer and try to make my own Ginger Syrup!
The day started strangely, and really just progressed from there. When I awoke, it took a few hours to be sure I was awake. Often I caught myself engaging in my “Tooth Test”. For those not familar with this concept, which I assume will in fact be all of you, the “Tooth Test” is quite simply a device I use to determine whether I am awake or dreaming. Simply put I try and pull out my teeth. If they shatter, break or merely give way leaving behind a bleeding gum, I know I’m dreaming. If they remain, awake it is. Although, I do wonder what will happen when I’m old, grey and toothless.
Compare that to the Second Circuit ruling that made detailed observations about the types of knowledge that may disqualify an intermediary from claiming safe harbour protection. As explain by Eric Goldman, there are three main types of knowledge an intermediary might possess:
It calls on all leaders “to promote and protect equal rights for women and girls.” In particular, it asks religious and traditional leaders “to set an example and change all discriminatory practices within their own religions and traditions.”
‘It includes agreement in principle for practical non-lethal support to them inside Syria,’ Mr Hague said.
Transportation completely sucks.
Fact Number 3: I never even considered searching the name online. Never. Who would have known that this very thing might be a good idea????. Like I said, I really had no idea what a blog was about. I thought you'd write a post and 1000's of people would come comment and love you! Ha! That first post only got one comment and I have no idea how they even found me. (see, I told you I did not have a clue, for we all know that is not how it happens!)
Throughout my career as a family physician, I have been a student of human suffering. I have had the opportunity through the lens of medical practice to observe and participate in various crisis points in my patients’ lives, and as a result, I have learned about the many ways in which we humans cope with the tragedies of our existence. In addition, my education in suffering was abruptly accelerated several years ago when my father took his own life, leaving me in an uncharted abyss of grief, guilt, and loss. I began working with hospice patients as a means of healing my devastation over his suicide, immersing myself in death and grief in order to find a way out of my pain. While I expected to encounter even more sadness and despair as I sat at the bedside of the dying, I discovered that some of those patients were actually more fully alive during their final moments than most people I knew.
Say you're sorry when you hurt somebody.
He was looking away from her but forced himself to face her with what he was about to tell her, “I never told you that, but I did. I really did.”
What would you like to outlaw in your relationship?
If for some reason you are unable to attend, you can arrange for someone else to attend in your
Among the rocks where Koa grow.
**this post or journal entry comes when I am actually in week 6 and I am Struggling with Day 1. It is so hard for me to do and I have no idea why, I must keep motivated**
-The boys
Like I said, summer is great...painting and lunching...lunching and painting! ;-)
I have just two things to say in response to his response.
Jessy, who hails from Venezuela, grew up in North Dakota, and later moved to New York City, has a voice and singing style that ropes in passersby who find themselves entranced and engaged. The talent of all the members of the group is exceptional, and it comes as a huge treat to find such talent on the street - Jessy Carolina and the Hot Mess has performed in a variety of venues, both in and out of the city. Catch 'em when you can. I'll see you in the parks and streets of New York City, lured by the Sirens of Culture :)
Second-Class Male contains the letters Stan has been written to the great and the good of showbiz, politics, and high street retail. He even butters up old General Noriega with only a second-class stamp, so why not buy a copy of the publishing sensation of the year (excluding Paul O’Grady’s collector's guide to SAS Land Rovers).
A son wishes to know his father’s secrets. To learn them is cheap–time, patience, vigilance, cunning are all in ready supply. These are not the price. The price is in the knowing.
AS: Your images are accompanied by handwritten text, which gives them context and deepens the narrative of the series. It also mimics the conventions of the family photo album, which is almost extinct. Can you talk about the role of text in your work?
Christ, our High Priest, is the Word that is able to divide the soul and the spirit.
Nima Hejazifar (M.Sc.) is an academic researcher, speaker, and learning consultant with a proven track record in successful evaluation of technologically enhanced settings in higher education. I have excellent knowledge of adult learning principles (e.g., self-regulated learning, motivation theory, etc.) and the factors that influence one’s performance in face-to-face, online, or blended learning environments. My work as a researcher was recognized at a 2010 Sloan-C international blended learning conference, where I was selected to present my findings on the effectiveness of blended/hybrid learning instructions in higher education. I have been recently selected again to present my new exploratory model of resoufurceness and blended learning at the upcoming 2012 Sloan-C international blended learning conference in Wisconsin. Apart from academic work, I have also developed professional development workshops for university students. These workshops have enabled many students to advance dramatically in their academic standings. In some cases, students have turned around their academic standings from the being in the top 25 percent to being in the top 3 percent of their class.
Sure, there is a familiar feel to At the Gates and all those elements, (which for me have become hallmarks of the series), make an appearance here as well, this is the first time that I've felt the series was moving towards something bigger. Marquitz doesn't go as far as the big reveal, but he does craftily deliver some tasty morsels that seem to hint at a much grander scheme than I anticipated for this series. Marquitz added a nice layer of history and put in the foundations for greater depth to the story that hint at playing out as the story and series progress. Let me just say that I am very pleased with these developments. The layers that Marquitz added to his characters and to his world all point towards even more greatness for the series.
The restaurant – famed as the latest venue for acclaimed Scottish chef Steven Adair – offers contemporary yet affordable Scottish cuisine using the very best locally sourced ingredients.
But I know I saw you pray.
Let me start this post by enumerating why people hate fat people:
“This construction, which began on Monday, is being carried out in co-ordination with UNIFIL (the United Nations Interim Force in Lebanon) and the Lebanese army,” she said. “The wall is intended to avoid frictions on the border.”
09/21/2011 BUY 0.01 audusd 1.01684
Pádraic Gilligan is VP of Industry Relations at MCI and VP of MCI’s DMC unit, Ovation Global DMC. Ovation has partnered with the Swiss Congress and Incentive Bureau (SCIB) in the creation of the inaugural Ovation Trophy, a “marvellous adventure” style journey from Lucerne to Zermatt. Huge thanks today and every day to Barbra Albrecht, Guendalina Rampazzi and the entire SCIB team and to our own Aoife Delaney for pulling it all together so effortlessly.
When Thimmayya’s term as army chief ended, Nehru and Menon ignored Thimmayya’s recommendation to make General Thorat the army chief, preferring to appoint Pran Nath Thapar. Where Thorat was known as a ‘fighting general’ in the mould of Patton and Rommel, Thapar was known to be politically well-connected, related to Nehru by marriage. (He was the uncle of historian Romila Thapar and TV journalist Karan Thapar’s father.) Thanks to family connections, another political general Brij Mohan Kaul was appointed commander of the Indian forces in the vital northeast sector. Kaul was to earn eternal infamy by running away from the battlefield to get himself admitted to a Delhi hospital when the Chinese attacked in 1962.
Professor Adrian North of Scotland’s Heriot-Watt University has been studying the links between people’s personalities and their choice of music. After to a study of more than 36,000 people from around the world, he has concluded that musical taste and personality are closely related. More information about the results can be found here.
Garrett Bischoff is headed to the ring, next.
Forgotten vegetables, smoked pork jowl, yabby tails with aromas of cedar
Bexley has always impressed me as a festival that manages its stock well- they always have all the beers on at the start of the festival, and despite attracting some crowds (it is only Sidcup), they usually manage not to sell out too quickly. I didn't find out how long it lasted though, standing in front of the bar with ten other keenos at opening time in a state of ecstacy enduced by a full range to choose from. And I'd only had about 15 of the 60 or so beers tempting me. Good going Bexley dudes- rare beers from mini breweries from all over the place. I appreciate all the benefits of Locale, don'y get me wrong, but it is so nice to go to a London area festival and not be confronted with just Sambrooks and Shepherd Neame.
Don't misunderstand me, I know that when you find intimacy it becomes about more then sex. But I just can't get there without it.
Winter Haven Water Utilities, 401 6th Street SW, Winter Haven
As their frenzy to degrade science metastacized, it turned into a campaign against every “smartypants caste” or knowledge profession in American life. Their other goal - destruction of the U.S. Civil Service - would then leave just one elite standing. The same elite that crushed liberty and markets in every other culture for 6000 years. The same oligarchic elite that Adam Smith publicly despised in Wealth of Nations, calling it the basic enemy of true capitalism and the age-old oppressor of mankind.
Rolos (unwrapped)
just is not adequate. Walking half a block from parking spots to stores is beyond the catchment areas for cycling shopping. Some retailers understand marketing and how to attract cycling customers, considering that they have disposable money not spent on maintaining and operating cars. These merchants even offer bike parking inside stores. In larger shopping areas where visits to multiple of stores on a shopping trip is common, electronic, trip rental lockers or secure bike cages and corralled parking with restricted or attended access give higher level of comfort to cyclists that bicycles and shopping will still be there when one returns.
All others ‘round deny?
V/A - Lovedolls Superstar (SST 1986, comp with Redd Kross, The Lovedolls, Black Flag...)
You see to be financially independent you must first understand that you are already affluent, born totally abundant. The world has no control over your abundance no matter what the economy is doing. There is no need to buy into a poverty mentality and live a life filled with the stresses inflicted upon you by your materialization of lack and limitation. That’s right. You materialized it in your experience and you can make a choice to demonstrate Abundance as well.
I usually just make one, but since these mosquitoes are getting on my nerves, I made 3, one plastic and then just used some empty coffee bottles I had laying around.
The discount code is valid throughout June for 20% off any purchase of $5 or more, just enter JUNEBUG at checkout.
One of my literary heroes, whom I’ve already mentioned, is Philip Larkin. “Geographers are firmly bound to place. Space is not homogeneous: something always happens somewhere; everything takes place. Larkin takes the opposite view; he is the poet of undifferentiated space.”[6] Even a poem like ‘Here’ – ostensibly about a place (on the surface, Hull)…
However, there are still a number of matters to be dealt with, some of which are highlighted in the specific questions within the policy document.
Ah, lyrics as sweet as the Dunkel I'm having right now. The poetic prowess of a fellow homebrewer putting to song the toils and tribulations of this fine art. Cheers to you, Nate.
And Jesus spoke more of Hell and warned more intently about Hell because of His love for us. Because He did not want anyone to choose it. Because He wants people to be free of the second death. And Jesus took it upon Himself, the curse of sin which is death, but He rose again overcoming death, so that we can be set free.
- Shammy 4/21/12 8:45am
E) Daphne. Yes, she and David fought all the time. They seemed to hate each other. But Rachel suspected there very well might be sexual tension behind that bickering. Who would David prefer-a feisty woman who challenged him? Or a shy teenager obsessed with food and obsessed with him?
The Germans seem to be the only people on earth who fully understand this and recognize that money demand could collapse if markets realize and begin to internalize the difference.
editor. He has also been listed as a director of Searchlight Information Services. Sonia Gable (Gerry Gable’s wife) also writes
Thanks for hanging in for this VLP (very looooong post) and have a crafty week! I will see you all soon!
And finally, last but not least the Summers Studio ceramic focal, the blue melon beads, and brass toggle were all used to create this piece. Lots of Copper wire, some teal and magenta colored freshwater pearls, some rondelles of Aquaterra (also called Sediment) Jasper and some chain and I came up with this...
"My mom still is. Who else would move to the White House? Now, that’s love," she added, to laughter.
Okay, now that you have a way that you are getting home your next task should be where to sleep. Yes, it sucks that you are stuck in the airport, but try to make yourself as comfortable as possible.
Maybe I’m just having anxiety dreams ahead of the trial. Aunt Paige gets mad when I call it that–my trial–but isn’t that what it is?
DARK SHADOWS – MAY 11
Today’s EU is an abusive, bullying elite toiling on behalf of itself. Almost the same applies in the United States of America, but it is the localism of small town and Tea Party America that will probably, in the end, bring that elite down – because access to the political system is being allowed to them, and US citizens have a stronger civic sense than us.
If. Everything. Goes. Right.
In 1957, Arthur 'Artie' Singer asked a well-known talent agent named Nat Segall for some help with a song that he'd co-written with Johnny Madara and Dave White for Danny And The Juniors called Do The Bop. The song was interesting because it married the twelve-bar blues chord progression of early rock and roll with the 50s chord progression from Country music. Artie was working as vocal coach for the harmony quartet at the time. The group started in 1955 as the Juvenaires from John Bartram High School in Philadelphia and featured lead singer Danny Rapp, with first tenor Dave White, second tenor Frank Maffei, and baritone Joey 'Terry' Terranova. Just before they recorded Do The Bop, they'd changed their name to Danny And The Juniors.
Despite this, it's an unglamorous truth that I'm very contented these days. Yes, even when I'm wringing the poo out of babygros.
and said you had a crush on her,
I am hoping to add other fruits from my vast collection of Flourishes stamps over the next few days. Believe it or not, I couldn't find the paper I had in mond from the dozens of paper pads I have on hand, so I printed out some digital papers on XPress cardstock. It worked great.
Brother Leo, the companion of the Blessed Francis, said that there was once a friar of such holiness that he seemed to be on an equality with the Apostles themselves. Yet in the end he yielded to temptation and left the Order. But, living in the world afterwards, he still gave the appearance of being of such virtue that he seemed almost to attain to apostolic perfection. One day when Brother Leo and some other friars were walking along a road with the Blessd Francis, the question was raised by some of the brethren as to why that brother had left the Order. But the saint replied, ‘I want to read something and to ask myself some questions which I shall myself answer. Let no one speak to me until I have done.’ And then he said the word ‘Humility’, which he repeated three or four times. Then ‘Chastity’, ‘Abstinence’, ‘Poverty’. And in this way he ran through a number of virtues, mentioning each one several times. And with each one he asked himself, ‘Do you know that?’ and answered, ‘Yes, I know that.’ Finally he said, several times over, the word ‘Fear’. And when he asked himself, ‘Do you know that?’ he answered, ‘No.’ Then again he cried out, ‘Fear,’ repeating the word over and over again. But when he asked himself, ‘Do you know that?’ again he answered, ‘No.’ So yet again he cried, ‘Fear,’ and at last whispered to himself, ‘Yes, I know Fear.’ Then he added these words, ‘It is useless for a man to seek all virtues and leave out Fear; yet few have it, and therefore it is hard to teach them.’ And finally, ‘It was because he had no Fear that that good brother fell and left the Order.’
This next one is worse.
1 vaults
I pitied them.
This aggressive behavior culminated a few years later in our returning home from the movies to find Scooter huddled in the corner and nursing a wounded eye. Spooky had literally tried to put her eye out and in the process left one of his claws embedded in her forehead so deeply it had to be removed with forceps.
More information can be found at
Flaming shades of streetlight scattered in windowpane waterdrops, but I’m not there. The space between light and its surface, its orb of origin – lashed by amber streaks – is sacrosanct, and I dare not imbibe for fear of possible disruption. Rather follow the blades of light, flashing off in cardinal directions, cast from novae across the street.
This journey did provide us with hints, clues, reveals and answers about the "Island" along the way, but some chose to not see them and that's okay because that part of the story is secondary. LOST also gave us hints to death and "this place" being a place of punishment, suffering and learning throughout the years. Sometimes it was literal, other times it was subliminal and/or metaphoric.
integration design, migration strategies, etc.
I couldn’t help but sense the irony and wonder in it all. My wife and I were visiting my older brother and his wife near Williamsburg, Virginia.
Once she figured out where she was and that i was there, she seemed to settle down....we waited a bit for her room...she ate and took her meds as needed. She stayed FLAT on her back and was content watching TV non-stop.
In our world you are perceived always to be separate from events as an individual
Dyan Revealy will be at Stamp Asylum and we have added the same class on Saturday and Sunday to give everyone an opportunity to experience Dyan's unique mixed media class.
Nice and fresh, you could really taste all the ingredients because there wasn't much of a dressing. The recipe said to dry the grapefruit in paper towel for several hours, key to keeping your salad from getting soggy. Next time, I'd probably leave out the mint. I like mint, but not really in my food.
I've always believed in logical consequences -- in theory -- but the cold hard reality is that I still rely too much on yelling or nagging. So far, this is working for all of us. In general, they are little more mindful of turning off the lights behind them. If I do have to turn off a light, I get a quarter. I may even stop issuing the reminders. I'm not really irritated about it, because I'm collecting those quarter-dollars in a lovely little dish.
March 27, 2012 at 5:02 PM
We open the show, as always, at the diner. In a quick opening bit, Han comes in with a newspaper so everyone can see if they won the $120 million lottery. After Max, Oleg, and Han mention what they would buy (Han would finally subscribe to Netflix!), the group finds out they lost.
Seafood was my first stop – smoked salmon, prawns, crab with tartare for dip.
Good deeds pay back better.
"If she was my mother, I would have wanted her triaged and treated the way she was," Dr. Jack Stanborough said.
Will always believe in you
But why did DBI and Russian have to get involved with the free market like that? Kupros is a legally licensed seller of beer. They determine their profit margin, not Russian River or DBI. Granted Kupros was gouging, and some people complained, and it made DBI and Russian River look like the bad guys. Oil companies can get us to pay $4 a gallon for gas and generate profits in the billions. HP sells printer ink for $8000 a gallon, and we gladly pony up. So if some overenthusiastic Beer Geek buys a ticket for a $45 dollar pour, more power to 'em!
I’ll refrain from describing the entire plot and all the characters, because there’s really a lot to it despite only being a 2 cours series, but I will say the quality does decline gradually but noticeably. Many times Yukiteru places his trust in someone only to be betrayed, and constantly relies on Yuno to save him. Many of the other players are fairly inconsequential in the grand scheme of things – it almost takes on a ‘monster of the week’ type feel, where each arc ends with the defeat of a boss in a fairly predictable manner. And throughout it all Yukiteru just continues to whine and be pathetic, although genuine feelings for Yuno do start to grow. Fortunately most of that was offset by being in the same season as Guilty Crown and the… memorable Shu. But nonetheless, he’s still quite annoying.
Takeda Pharmaceutical Company Limited 22
Now take the word “Happy”. I still vow to only tell you how much I liked something. When it comes to posting about my opinion on the Internet, I abide by the motto of Thumper’s mommy: If you can’t say anything nice, don’t say anything at all. (Unless of course it’s dangerous or disgusting). That’s just me though. I still depend heavily on hardcore, no holds barred, opinions and reviews to make many decisions.
-End-
But then I lose track of reality. I become so entranced by these characters, they come to life. And so does their world. In my latest effort (the closest I've come to writing fan fiction) I'm completely rewriting history . . . and it all fits so well I think it all must have actually happened.
Trainsong 143
sorry completely forgot to post my July 16th set, so... here we go now
Does this make any sense to you at all? I am writing it here, rather than in my journal, to prove to myself that I am sufficiently unashamed of it, and sufficiently convinced of its rational value to show it off. Yes, I do want external validation. I imagine that would make me feel more comfortable. And yet I know myself sufficiently well to know that I will go my own way, whatever anyone else thinks.
December 14 Cleveland, OH House of Blues
In India, according to Vedic civilization, a brāhmaṇa who is learned is considered to be the topmost man in human society. The paṇḍita, who is learned and gentle, sees such a brāhmaṇa on the same level with a dog or an outcaste who eats dogs. In other words, he sees no distinctions between the highest and the lowest. Is this to say that being a learned brāhmaṇa is no better than being a dog? No, that is not so. But the paṇḍita sees them as the same because he does not see the skin but the spirit. One who has learned the art of seeing the same spirit soul within every living being is considered to be a paṇḍita, for in actuality every living being is a spiritual spark, part and parcel of the complete spirit whole. The spiritual spark is the same in all, but it is covered by different dresses. An honored man may come in a very shabby dress, but this does not mean that he should be dishonored. In Bhagavad-gītā these material bodies are likened unto dresses which are worn by the spirit soul.
Shhh...do not disturb this fleeting peaceful sweetness...
Tired of defining success by what others see in terms of numbers or income or job title.
can be used to grow fresh vegetables.
Welly: " I can if you teach me! We can do it together...like a family"
another symbol of
"We cannot have a situation in which, to take a hypothetical example, a pianist might be condemned by a critic who cannot play a note and could consequently be stirred by dubious motivations, such as professional jealousy of another critic who has expressed a contrasting opinion of that artist. We believe that making each critic perform for the panel will not only test their own innate musicianship - and hence the integrity of their judgments - but will also give them a degree of empathy for their targets and the process that each of those musicians undergoes every time he or she is on stage."
*There is some important hair splitting to be done here in relationship to my views as New Ager, and if I get any requests, I’ll go into that…but (1) I can see where you might see some contradictions between this point and New Age belief that I would agree would constitute a prima facie case against my spiritual beliefs (2) I have considered them and I believe that while there is a prima facie case to be made it does not hold up under scrutiny.
Do you have a skirted sofa that needs some help?
And I lost sleep at night
He was long and lithe like her, naked but for a thin sheet. With his long tapering ears and wide set eyes, she recognized him as one of the people of Nazerak, the first born. By his features and by the rough scar where one of his eyes should be, she recognized him as her first kill. By his pallid flesh, colorless hair and eyes, and his threatening expression, she knew him to be a shade, one of the terrors of the dark, and an enemy of her people: their curse. They called themselves her people’s dark cousins, and claimed that it was their duty to escort the living to the underworld, by killing them. A sinister grin crossed this one’s face as it regarded Princes Sharia with evil arched eyebrows.
Our guest designer, Amy Bowerman Stucki of Plucking Daisies, has accepted a position on the permanent design team! She has been a wonderful fit right from the beginning and I am thrilled that she will be staying on to share her talent with us! Welcome Amy!
Also I would love it if you could pop over to my FB Album and tell me your favourite projects I have created over the last year for Graphic 45!! Just leave a comment under the one's you like the best! Thanks :) :P
Events on 17 September 2011 at Singapore Botanic Gardens
3) The demand for self- discipline. “A good teacher has to study. Hard.”
The porcupines, realizing the situation, decided to group together to keep warm. This way they covered and protected themselves. But the quills of each one wounded their closest companions.
05. Outa Space (Billy Preston)
Once again, my mate Dave tells me the biggest ones used for this application were about 30kT; as they need to be a decent size to fuse enough ground into glass to seal the well.
Lying
Yep I've told myself to slow down...the last 2 weeks have been go go go...no I'm not talking everyday life I'm talking Sewing too much going on in the brain it's in Overdrive...
Before returning to discussions about more recent developments in the world of Electronic Voice Phenomena, one more blast from the past:
May 05, 2012
So the first thing I had to do was take everything out.
because I have a plan in place if they do.
I had not even finished a cup Milo for breakfast, when my brother arrived. I told him, I need to pray first, and I told him to wait for me.
I also had 2 parcels waiting for me when I got home - both candy gifts from Suzanne and Angela. Another big thank you for papers, stamps, sketchbook and other bits and pieces and a wonderful comment from Suzanne about my work - how lucky am I?
Unfolds potential masterfully meeting the resonance
No sunset colors shine
ANYWAY--
541350 Building inspection services
Now to get the diy headboard in there and start making it pretty! We are off to Halifax for the weekend though so it may have to wait a bit but maybe I'll find some goodies while we are out shopping. It was unanimous for the dresser - bold it is! No white this time, I'm listening to my readers on this one!
It is evident that you are spending way too much time on Pinterest when you are not seeing any new pins in your favorite categories when you check in after a couple of hours.
T-Travel- How do you handle eating while traveling? I go crazy and eat just about any damn thing I want. Sad, I know.
From one of the 1709 Blog team's new members, Asim Singh, comes some pretty hot news from France. As Asim explains:
“Finally! We’ve been wondering when you’d show up.” Twisting her neck to find the source of the sound, she found Devi and Arianna in one of the back tables, waving their arms frantically to catch her attention. Thankfully, they bought her drink before she showed up, knowing she’d get there eventually. Pulling out her history book from her bag, a dark shadow crossed over her.
When told by a fellow netizen not to be too fussy, he replied:
I recently read Sylvester Lamin's The Coconut Bond, a novel that gives a fascinating look into recent Sierra Leonese history and culture. It makes passing, casual reference to characters' initiations into the poro secret society for men and bondo secret society for women. There's a Hugh Masekela song called "African Secret Society"--the title sounds like it's an imaginary thing, but he's probably referring to similar institutions in South African cultures.
What happens when you win 5 league games in a row? You get a blog post dedicated to you from a die hard fan. The Kolkata Knight Riders put up a mind-boggling performance against the Pune Warriors India to win their 5th consecutive game in the Indian Premier League, thanks to the skipper, Gautam Gambhir, who led the lads from the front and scored 56 runs off 36 balls. Brendon McCullum played a fantastic innings as well, backing up Gambhir.
At several of my news sources recently, there were stories/reports on the poor weather conditions of the past Summer season -- mostly the extreme heat/lack of rain -- causing a MAJOR shortage in this years peanut crop. Peanut farmers are reporting up to 70% or more of this years harvest will never make it out of the fields. The peanuts are DOA.
I haven’t flown in an airplane yet, but I know the seatbelt will fit comfortably when I finally have an opportunity to fly. (Probably Chicago will be my next flight yippee!) I know the seats will be a bit roomier and I’ll actually be able to cross my legs during the flight.
After living so far from family for several years, I truly have a deep appreciation for living near everyone now. I love that no one has to travel for holidays or special occasions. We can get together and then everyone gets to go home and sleep in their own bed. It's such a wonderful set-up that there are days when I can scarcely believe what a blessing it is to be near family. It is something I will never take for granted!
Blogs
Whether brown or yellow
As complainant’s counsel in Civil Case No. B-259, it was incumbent upon respondent to invite his client’s attention as to the compromise agreement, especially so when there is a pending court order for the submission of the same. There is nothing in the record which shows that respondent did anything in this respect, even when, as per his admission, he and complainant were in communication at that time, albeit, with regards to another case.
My point is that the postcard and the Will & Grace episode got me thinking, and I couldn’t remember the last time I swam laps. I like to think that swimming is a regular activity in my workout arsenal, but it’s been over three months since I’ve been in a pool (I had to look that up – so thankful I make note of every workout!).
through heaps of white noise,
needs to be thrown out
As you know, the bishops spoke as one, saying
CONGRATULATIONS! TODAY IS YOUR DAY. YOU'RE OFF TO GREAT PLACES! YOU'RE OFF AND AWAY!- Dr. Seuss
these days my ears
Here is Magali - the two of us got a 6am plane on the day to be in Naples on time for the event! what you don't do for cigars! :)
I know you know what I mean. Time to fess up to my transgressions.
Because on pad I wrote
Best of all, a couple of more brain ideas regarding concepts and detailing came to mind. Pun intended. Stay tuned!
As of Monday, MOH and I have been sticking to putting the kids down at 8:30. This has been a real lifesaver for me because I can get most of my work done before midnight now. (This is prepping notes for the next day at school and stuff like that.) If I keep being this productive I might actually get the taxes done early this year. Not holding my breath though.
Where: The Holiday Inn Capitol Square - Columbus, Ohio
You talk about the EDL being up in arms when Muslims do what the EDL does. Are you up in arms when Muslims do what the EDL does? Or are you a typical hypocritical Leftist who allows brown people to do all sorts of things white people can’t do? Again, I bet you claim that you’re not a Leftist and that you are also against Muslim violence. I bet if I checked this site I wouldn’t find a single comment of yours explicitly condemning Muslim or Leftist law-breaking.
This isn’t coincidence people. This is God at work, answering the prayers of the faithful. We have the power to influence the direction this war takes by the power of our prayers. That being said, I ask you to pray for increased stability in Afghanistan. I ask you to pray for a successful withdrawal of our troops. I ask you to pray for the military men and women you may know, and pray that God makes their burden of service light. I ask that you pray for their safe return to their families and friends here in the States.
Outside after the argument, Arizona's governor was asked if, in fact, the state does have plans for a mass incarceration of the estimated 400,000 illegal immigrants in her state.
Des chatons=Some kittens
Approaching their 30th anniversary, Big Country (with Mike Peters from The Alarm as guest vocalist), are lining up concerts for a period of celebration that will not only embrace their illustrious past but also honour the life and times of original lead singer, guitarist and co-founder Stuart Adamson, who passed away so tragically in 2001.
We know the films are great, so talk about that a little (either in a serious way or in personal experience mode), but then discuss how the format of Blu-ray helps or hinders the presentation of the film. Extras should be discussed and ultimately decide whether this is a film that you think upgrading to Blu-ray is essential or not.
That's it. Sales pitch over.
@beige Listen to that Three Moves Ahead JA2 podcast if you’ve time and are keen…you’ll hear an hour of just why that game is one of the best PC titles of all time. The rabbit hole runs deep. Let me not waffle, but to say it is possibly the most ambitious strategy game of all time and, moreover, actually achieves such a claim is no hyperbole.
A few steps from the temple lies a small but well know pastry shop. By well know, I mean their products are available in the U.S. ...or at least Seattle. Besides their famous almond cookies, they had a wide assortment of other pastries. Caught them in the act making these wafers; one of those sweet and savory snacks that asians are known to love. A sweet crisp egg wafer with a strip of seaweed and salted peanut filling.
That is where I stopped until I work on it more, but I won’t wait as long as before to return to it. Besides, now I’m REALLY looking forward to the completed image. When I am done, I’ll be sure to post it!
-And one of my favorites, I told one of the best surgeons in the country he needed to get back to work, and he is operating on a pretty important brain! Laugh some time right?
- Foodie Penpals is open to US & Canadian residents. Please note, Canadian Residents will be paired with other Canadians only. We’ve determined things might get too slow and backed up if we’re trying to send foods through customs across the border from US to Canada and vice versa. So, I’m going to keep two separate lists and match US w/ US and Canada w/ Canada!
I just enjoy doing what makes me, Me,
Each of them delivered concise, eloquent remarks that would qualify for any “Style Page” feature that requires drama, courage, human interest, resolve and proposed reforms. C-SPAN, replete with astonishingly repetitive right-wing events, was not there. Some members of the fourth estate – reporters, columnists, editorial writers or profilers – were in attendance, but no major news outlets covered this splendid event.
Several doctors mentioned the importance of being polite and respectful to the doctor on call—the physician who is covering for your doctor. If you are not, word gets around. This affects how the doctor and her staff perceive you, and it can affect the quality of your medical care.
He said the State was not presenting factual evidence.
Something that caught my eye in October this year and I have been referring to repeatedly during recent workshops is an article in the Science Daily blog about two 2010 experiments at the University of Pennsylvania
One big general denialist argument is about climate models. These are fabulously complicated computer programmes that attempt to model the Earth’s atmosphere. The number-crunching is so vast that Myles Allen has contracted it out to you and me. He began Climateprediction.net, which uses downtime on people’s home computers to run climate simulations. Try it. You should. The idea is to cut the uncertainties in the models. And there are, no question, huge uncertainties. All complex systems are uncertain. But, for two closely related reasons, the denialists are wrong to claim this as an argument in their favour. First, empirical evidence either shows the models are right or, especially in the case of Arctic ice, that they are understating the problem. Lovelock, in particular, says this understatement has given us a model-based false sense of security. The disaster is coming much sooner than we thought.
One day, as fate would have it, a dog found me. I was playing in the backyard alone, while my parents were doing yard work in the front yard. This tiny little dog squeezed itself through our wrought-iron fence. It had a spiky collar and short, dark brown fur. Clearly, he was a present from God. So I took him inside.
The Holy Spirit will put a strict watch on you, and with a jealous love rebuke you for careless words and feelings, or for wasting your time, which other Christians never seem distressed over.
What I've succumbed to Is making me numb
Today is the LAST day to vote for the Independent Book Blogger Award on Goodreads.
The date is week which begins on Monday, February 14th.
Until all music is available for renting, some music needs to be owned. You’ll have two systems to maintain. Your rental library and your cloud library, or if you collect physical music, your collects of 78s, 45, LPs, CDs, cassettes, reel-to-reel tapes and 8-tracks. And I tend to think even the people who love physical media music will want to convert their collection to the cloud to make it easier to play.
HSN LIVE sponsor Cricket offers Muve Music, the first wireless rate plan to include unlimited music. The Muve Music plan includes unlimited song downloads, ringtones, and ringback tones, as well as nationwide calling, unlimited messaging and 3G mobile data. Muve Music is the first music experience designed specifically for the mobile phone— no syncing, no computers, no cords needed - ever.
10/19/2007 205.30 *Praxair
Perhaps it is genetic, as my well traveled mother and cousin also claim London as their own. As does the Queen, Shakespeare, the whole of the West End, Burberry and more. I am in fine company.
react_petting: fine. excited, doesn't like feet touched. She just pulls feet away
They went directly to the barn, and grabbing whatever buckets they could find, began helping to put out the fire along with all the other people. As they did they began to inquire as to how the fire had started. All they were able to find out in the rush of things was that there was a great thunderous explosion somehow, and the barn caught on fire.
3. Not tense or taut; loose: a slack rope; slack muscles.
Didn’t the “second coming” already happen, three days after the Crucifixion, for forty days before the Ascension?
I recommend the traditional slow-rise yeast for heavier doughs, using all whole wheat or other whole grain flours and those incorporating ingredients like sprouted wheat berries and nuts. I’d also recommend allowing several hours for those dough risings.
Nov 24 Cambridge Junction Cambridge, UK
During the last quarter of the nineteenth century, "Ó, guð vors 1ands" was often sung in public by choral societies. But it was not until during the period beween Home Rule and Independence, i.e. from 1904-1918, that it became established by tradition as the national anthem. When sovereignty was officially proclaimed, it was played as the national anthem of Iceland at the ceremony, and such it has remained ever since. – The Icelandic Government acquired the ownership of the copyright of the mélody – which formerly had been held by a Danish music-publishing firm – in 1948, and that of the words in 1949.
antique businesses for years now,
2) The tertiary characters aren’t much better.
Lots of sunshine. But a bit chilly!
Because I was putting mine in a frame I was able to skip her adhesive step...honestly probably saving myself quite a bit of hassle.
I was talking to Avery the other day and I told her that perhaps I could be a secret agent. No one would ever suspect a senior arthritic plus sized super model. It, of course, doesn't help that I really don't like guns and I can't move very fast. Maybe I could get the scoops. Of course, in crowds I don't hear that well, so I may have to ask the bad people to speak up a little so I could hear their clandestine conversations from the next booth.
with his combination wrench—
Favorite Use of Fruit: While dining at Miho Izakaya, in Portland, Oregon, one of the dishes was Wasabi Watermelon, and though simple, it was impressive. Watermelon cubes, soaked in a wasabi sauce, and sprinkled with black sesame seeds. The juicy watermelon had a slight spicy kick which paired well to the sweetness of the fruit. Can't wait to make this next summer.
(inside).....Find yourself a little SUGAR!
What the f*ck? Without any context, this game looks so stupid. I know you're not supposed to judge a book by its cover (or game, in this case), but how could you not. I can easily see myself or others going to the game store, looking at the wall of games, and passing on this one without a thought. I don't remember this game being advertised either, so that didn't really help matters.
It was fate that brought us together
They say Oates shot Olivera execution-style while the victim had his back turned. Olivera was carrying a gun that night as well, but he never fired his weapon, authorities have said.Another well-known incident locally, involved the shooting of a homeless squatter in Spartanburg. They shot him before even calling law enforcement.
“Two and a half years!” he snarled back. “I gave up so much for you – I gave up football, I stopped playing for the academy when I could have turned professional so I could be with you more, I’ve done everything you wanted for two and a half years, and one hand on your tit is the furthest I’ve got, how the hell is that taking advantage?”
WEST HOLLYWOOD, Calif. (AP) ― A Halloween decoration showing a mannequin dressed as vice presidential candidate Sarah Palin hanging by a noose from the roof of a West Hollywood home is drawing giggles from some passers-by and gasps of outrage from others.
Understand, please, that I am not complaining, it is just that things are happening so fast. I love it, but still they are happening faster than I expected.
Have a wonder"fall” week!
"our lead vocalist has Aspergers and was born without eyes. He's obsessed with colour. We wrote a song about it (Green Lights) Rory also has perfect and absolute pitch. All being well, you should be able to listen to the song by clicking the Play button below:
LB: Danny Trevathan, Kentucky
A part of labor and a part of pain,
who proceeds from the Father and the Son.
“Mel…” she began, but I cut in to see if I could change the subject,
I am happy to introduce you to a good friend of mine, Carolina. I can count on one hand how many people I know in person that read my blog, she is one of them and is pretty much the only one I see regularly. (I enjoy my blog being more private from people I know in person). Anywho, she blogs over at Carolina's Creations. She has great make up tutorials and many other tutorials that she shares. Her make up tutorials have started becoming popular on pinterest, too. Here she is..
Won’t you join us?
Location service:
Thanks for Stopping by. I hope you come back often to see all the new projects I post. Now onto Misty 's page.
I’ll be doing part two and including your comments, (plus a link to your site) within the next few days! So keep the comments coming!
11) THE BEST TV SHOW EVER CREATED?
Where is the freedom of Christ here? Where is the blood of Christ that covers us all? Why are we standing so far apart on our respective hills, the theological ones we’re willing to die on, when we should be kneeling together at the foot of the cross where we are all on common ground?
In the right-time, it's the night time
Cloth Diapers are BETTER FOR THE ENVIRONMENT
Notwithstanding these conceptual challenges, the water wars thesis is used by decision makers and by political leaders in order to focus attention on global resource issues – and their particular basin concerns. In the main, these serve immediate political ends. Boutros-Boutros Ghali is on record as stating in the mid-1980s that “The next war in the Middle East will be fought over water, not politics.” And in the mid-1990s Ismail Serageldin of theWorld Bank warned that “If the wars of this century were fought over oil, the wars of the next century will be fought over water – unless we change our approach to managing this precious and vital resource.” Such concerns and warnings rarely attempt to interrogate the realities of conflict over rivers such as the Nile, but instead feed on widely perceived notions of insecurity and vulnerability within domestic populations. These feelings are often driven by public perceptions of the challenges facing shared river basins and their societies, and the political actors are feeding on and responding to those perceptions. Some of these wider perceptions will also have resulted from external factors such as the impact of drought in the Horn of Africa and on Nile flows during the 1980s.
no storms
I cradled my new record between both hands. Gently placed it on the turntable. Dropped the needle. Rushed to sprawl across my twin bed in the room I shared with my older sister, and picked up the stiff cardboard album jacket.
Don’t feel guilty if you don’t know what to do with your life. The most interesting people I know didn’t know at 22 what they wanted to do with their lives. Some of the most interesting 40-year olds I know still don’t.
Import the paper, then Format picture. Click on Picture. You can see lots of options here. Change the Accent Color:
He’s still the owner
In the summer months the emphasis is largely on the tourist industry. After the last charter flight leaves in October, Crete is devoted to farming and agriculture. They harvest their olives, oranges and other products. There are no direct flights at all to Crete during this period (only via Athens), but in March the flights resume and tourism becomes important once more.
Switching to choreography seems the only avenue that would still allow her to remain in her beloved art, but there are the high hurdles of the inspiration and of the will to motivate others that she must bring to the table.
Glory be to the Father and to the Son and to the Holy Spirit. As it was in the beginning is now and ever shall be, world without end. Amen
Stand by to find out why each man on this stage thinks his wife would be the best first lady.
Shocking Blue Venus NL
We can't wait to see what everyone creates for Challenge 2!!
The Lives of Real People
He concludes by proposing:
My bellydance teacher, Paige, is also coming down for the festival, so I'll have someone to attend the Hafla with. I've never actually been to a hafla, in three years of bellydance!
I started this blanket on the first of September so you can see it's quite a quick blanket to produce. I'm sure I could have completed it quicker if I hadn't been so busy. As I've said before granny squares are great projects to do when you don't feel like concentrating too much . They are so relaxing. Another bonus is the relatively small number of ends to sew in. Two for each row means 114 for the whole blanket...only takes an hour or so :0)
Jacob's Ladder
This evening, after I finally got home, I decided to kick back and enjoy a fine pair of weissen beers:
It is interesting to consider these findings when reading last year’s FDA Tobacco Products Scientific Advisory Committee (TPSAC) report on menthol (available here). It appears that TPSAC deliberately downplayed the Blot lung cancer findings, while discussing other findings in detail. The Stellman study was not even mentioned.
A couple of months later I began to see the effect of the shift. I first noticed it when someone said, ‘I come to the BURN because it’s a place where I can count on meeting God’. My heart soared and cried all at once! They were saying that about Bradford’s BURN! Later, another said, ‘This is going to sound weird because I haven’t spoken to any of you before, but after worshipping with you I feel like I love you all’. That one brought tears of joy to my eyes – I have had that experience myself, where the Lord knits your heart together with people you barely know, but who become incredibly dear to you after simply worshipping together with them for a few hours. For me, those people have become like close family. But this was the first time I had heard someone say that of the BURN in Bradford!
Let the loaf cool for a few minutes and gently unmold onto a cooling rack.
First up I have the card I'm planning to give my pops on Father's Day! Using the new Super Dad set and the new Ribbon Banner Die, this card was a breeze!
Of my brother, now dead but scared of life you
One solution
Ever willing to put my needs out there, I asked the seller (a used furniture dealer) what else he had. Any rugs? Well, amongst a rather stunning number of dining sets and crazy stacks of chairs from some sort of institution, he had one, and one only, rug.
I gotta get going now. We're driving to Pensacola today. Have a great weekend! I'll try to post more photos later...Until then, we want you to ponder the name of the New Oleans Police- NO PD!
ii) Highest hour volunteers will be given promotions but will still remain unpaid and ENTIRELY self-funded right down to the uniform and medals awarded for any worthy actions (they will pay for their own medals). This will abolish military and police costs, a self policing population will occur. Paramilitaries are also allowed at own cost.
!Would you guys autograph my sister’s scrapbook?” I didn’t know Taylor was a fa… Sister’s? Then why does it have a G on the cover?
So that I won't miss
Size of baby: A lemon...about 3.5 inches long, and he or she just about doubled in size since last week!
I cannot speak to the mesmeric force of beards, though I do confess to an instinctive distrust of clean-shaven men. But was the loss of Yeats' beard "for good or ill" at the aesthetic (as opposed to the mesmeric) level? You be the judge. The photo above depicts Yeats not long before the loss of his beard. The photo below comes from the 1890s, when (if I may editorialize) the transformation from Dashing Young Rake to Canned Ham with Hair was complete.
1) At 8:30 in the morning, Andrei had his visa interview at the U.S. Consulate. We had heard rumors that spouses aren't guaranteed non-immigrant/tourist visas since they might be just using their new marital status as an excuse to emigrate. The general approach is that the Consulate assumes the applicant will be tempted to stay in the U.S., and therefore he should prove that he has ties to his home country.
More new stuff- I cut gluten out of my diet for certain health reasons. I’ve been without it for 2 1/2 months now. It was really hard because I like carbs and I’m a bread girl. Gluten is present in wheat, barley and rye. Due to my poor self control I have not been baking. How can I put so much work into my food and not even be able to enjoy it myself? My usual favorites like homemade biscuits, fresh country white bread, chicken and dumpling soup, pancakes? I found some gluten free sorghum bread from the local food coop downtown. It’s tollerable, but I would never make my family eat it. Now, when I do ingest gluten I feel absolutely miserable and sick, so it’s becoming easier for me to turn it down. I’m ready to start baking for my family again. I did get my
This little pass-along award is for blogs you love with less than 200 followers and pass it to five other blogs. I totally qualify. And I am so blessed to receive it from Melissa. If you haven't been to her blog yet, it is gorgeous and she has a beautiful almost poetic voice to express her love for her family. I especially love QWA...Quinn's Weekend Adventures. Thank you so much, Melissa for both of these honors.
~ Must be 13 years or older to enter (This is an "adult" read so it does adult themes, though it's a very clean read for the most part- nothing you wouldn't really see in the typical YA.)
Some people wonder why this record is getting expensive on the used market, but not me. Elvin Bishop made some other good ones, but none that quite hit home like this one.
I designed this initially as a gift for my tutor, as she taught this novel on a course I did, and then had a flash of inspiration, and made her a similar design featuring the "lost Gothic" novel she edited and is a world expert on. I won't be sharing that chart, as it is very personal to Karen, but I'm happy to share this one - and I think more people will have heard of this book rather than The Mysterious Warning (unless they have memorised Northanger Abbey) :o) Hopefully, stitching this won't have the same effect as my gift did for the good doctor - I made her cry ... she'd taught me for the last four years, and I was hoping she'd be my dissertation supervisor, but there have been cutbacks at the University, and non-tenured staff have been shafted had their hours cut.
color thread that DMC makes!! Have you ever seen
American Bald Eagles:
Paul: no one likes these bastards
…when a mother asks us in front of her daughter if we know the tooth fairy? We tell her we sure do that we had tea with her just yesterday and the mom turns to the daughter and says, “see I told you the tooth fairy was a “she”!
John Wall averaged .9 blocks per game this season. Wall is one of eight players to play in all 66 games this year and have at least that many blocked shots. Wall is the only guard on that list of players and the only player under 6’9″.
There is no winning.
I love them dearly both my girl and boy.
on a glorious afternoon
They did not hesitate, for a nano-second, to reach out and extend their umbrella to service our cause; a cause that Bill himself had only good things to say about.
Maybe, like I said I love creating things; and editing videos and watching people smile as they watch them is something that I love also.
At the risk of over sharing, I am bloating. It's an awful feeling. Your pants are tight and you feel like you are carrying around and extra ten pounds. And to make it worse, you didn't even do anything to cause that! I chose not to weigh in yesterday because it was that bad. Still is. But it got me thinking. First question was, why does this happen in the first place? And the second, how do I fix it?
I had a really great DIY project and post planned for today, but I left my optometry appointment this morning with more than a contact lens prescription. My pupils were HUGELY dilated from the drops they used, and I even had to wear these super ghetto old man sunglass shields behind my glasses because daylight was too much for my eyes to handle, not to mention a computer or phone screen. Couldn't even read my text messages!
Never say, "Because I said so, that's why."
“We needed some innings, there was no question,” Mets manager Terry Collins said. “Dillon was going to have to throw 100 pitches today, because we were just short in the ‘pen.”
But I think it is, ultimately, a bad thing for parent and child.
Here's an example of a question that might be found on a modern IQ test.
I can survive on a far lower income than I ever thought possible. It’s not much fun, but it’s better than starving. Can the government not see that all they are doing is breeding resentment? And I’m not doing a worthless degree!
*******UPDATE ON UPDATE: It took 12 hours but eventually they all showed up! YEAY!*******
So for today's post, I'd love to hear from you: what would your current WIP be like if you flipped your protagonist's gender? What would change? What would stay the same?
The production team in true BBC "Stalinist" fashion blocked almost all callers who were in support of the the BNP's stance, while the one they did let on, was quickly cut off.
The words aren't exactly in the order they are in the verses, but the meaning is unchanged. I wanted them to be in the shape of a cross, hence the old switcheroo.
So the world she is a changing, and I love it. A local creative company has requested that people make a post on their facebook page and the post with the most “likes”, comments, and shares will be guaranteed an interview and I have my work cut out for me because the person currently in the lead has more than 300 votes and also has an amazing infograph created. I’m seriously a bit jealous!
That's where I've been falling down a bit - I feel terribly guilty, I've lurked on a few blogs but I feel I'm lacking the time to really get in there and comment. So that's my 2nd half of Janathon resolution - try to cut out the Negativity and get round a few other blogs and get posting.
Schuyler hoped to get there on her own someday, but it didn’t look like today was going to be it.
So I applied for a job at a place in Geelong called 'Stuck on You', a sticker factory, I was
Aren’t I a lucky girl?!
I’m a lead foot leaning on a supped up Chevy,
Mommy and Daddy bird are upset with me right now. I cleaned their cage, then, we put newspaper over the wire bottom, under the nesting box. That was the upsetting bit for them. They were acting scared of the bottom until the babies started yelling, then they overcame their fears pretty quick. *whew* Herbie looks to be about ready to come out, and I read somewhere to put newspaper over the wire bars when the babies are to come out.
Mix 2 teaspoons of almond meal with just enough liquid to form a paste. Spread onto moistened face and throat and gently massage for 1 minute. Rinse with warm water and follow with Almond oil. I love Aura Glow. It has a wonderful sent and I use it as a base oil.
Every morning I check out my site Country Gourmet Home to see what the DEAL OF THE DAY is. Today is meat loaf and that really sounds good on a cold snowy winter day. You really should check out the Deal of the Day, even I, as a consultant, am not able to take a discount because I am already given such a great deal. Now you may be asking why I would tell you about this when I don’t even get a commision as a consultant but I am all about getting a good deal and want to make sure everyone is aware that this is out there.
Report the crime right away!
I ain’t bothered about celebrity wives or the way they look.
trying to go in your perfectly
The Abomination of Desolation is claimed to be a highly significant event but interpretation – in terms of timing and entities – has been radically different, even among so-called sages and theologians. Essentially, it is believed that in the end times “The Beast” will be released from the bottomless pit and will take human form. His “abomination” will be to place a statue of himself in the temple in Jerusalem. Fundamentalist Christianity is well aware that their “anti-christ” will take up residence at the rebuilt temple but somehow go into reality disconnect when told the Judaism’s “messiah” will do the same thing, ruling the entire world from Jerusalem. Adding to this atmosphere of selective vision and awareness, Christianity also teaches that “every knee shall bow, every tongue confess” in these end times, with the death of any who would dare believe otherwise. Their “son of God” will arrive with sword in hand to lead the slaughter apparently, even though this directly violates and contradicts every single teaching and message we have from that enlightened being known as Christ. It is essential that I digress to provide some essential background knowledge that sheds additional light on the basis of these “predictions” and the systems that created them.
With Garth Snow dealing with a strained groin and Jean-Sebastien Aubin not playing well, Heberg was given the opportunity to see some action during the end of the regular season. He began with a 41 save performance in a 6-3 win over the Florida Panthers on March 16th, but lost to the Tampa Bay Lightning the next night. Heberg next recorded a tie with Boston before defeating New Jersey, Buffalo, Chicago, St. Louis, Tampa Bay and Carolina to finish the season 7-1-1, creating some excitement in Pittsburgh.
loving stupidly
just a simple, quick, reasonably Lo-Cal option.
What a selection! And I’ve still had to leave so much out. I’ve discovered some great new tracks, not all of which are in this ten. Songs by Motley Crue (Kick Start My Heart) and Anthrax ( A.I.R), for example, which could so easily have been in the ten. Thanks to everyone who made suggestions. Please comment on this one too and…. do your own and share it with us!
As the old hymn enthusiastically declares:
Her poetry became the basis of her lyrics, and she started playing at New York clubs. She signed with Shelter Records in 1974.
This is a hard prospect to swallow. The meaningless universe. Yet it takes only the appearance of a single ghost, vampire or demon to disprove it. The moment a supernatural representative of the force of evil turns up, it means there is hope again. If supernatural evil exists, then supernatural good must also exist, which means God exists, which means Heaven exists. Just one demon, however small, just one, and the afterlife is back on the agenda! So when an innocent character in a horror book or film is confronted with a genuine demon, he or she should fall to their knees and cry, “Thank you, thank you! You're my ticket to Heaven! I do have a soul after all. No eternal oblivion for me! The afterlife, here I come!”
Yet I wonder
The shrunken sea has ruined the once-robust fishing economy and left fishing trawlers stranded in sandy wastelands, leaning over as if they dropped from the air. The sea's evaporation has left layers of highly salted sand, which winds can carry as far away as Scandinavia and Japan, and which plague local people with health troubles.The story of the Aral Sea is the sort of thing you want to point to when people argue that technology and human ingenuity will save us from our own self-inflicted crises. The Shrinkage started with the Soviet Union's plan to divert the Amu Darya and Syr Darya to grow a bunch of cotton in the middle of the desert. Hilariously, the Soviets knew the Sea would vanish as a result of this plan - but they did it anyway:''It was part of the five-year plans, approved by the council of ministers and the Politburo,'' said Aleksandr Asarin, an expert at the Russian State Hydroproject Institute who angered his bosses by predicting, in 1964, that the sea was headed for catastrophe. ''Nobody on a lower level would dare to say a word contradicting those plans,'' he said, ''even if it was the fate of the Aral Sea.''Apparently Kazakhstan is working to revive what is now the North Aral Sea with some success. There's less hope for the southern sliver of the sea that remains. The water, already so salty as to have been rendered lifeless, continue to recede from the stranded fishing villages and rusting husks of Soviet-era fishing boats that used to subsist on the sea's bounty.
The key to answering these questions successfully is to be objective in approach and to avoid received wisdom. Unfortunately, many companies thrive on received wisdom and group think and it is difficult to advance beyond the opinion of the sales director or, in some cases, the MD. But for value-added strategies to be effective, an open forum of creativity is crucial. An independent but authoritative thought leader may be required.
Modern art experts and authorities now consider that perhaps Veronese himself was only responsible for the Virgin and Child. It would seem that it may be that the Virgin and Child together with the rest may have been painted by the followers of Jacopo Bassano.
Comments please....
remain.
Pretty much followed the recipe, although I added just a tablespoon of butter to make the cheese sauce, and used some mozerella in place of some of the provolone. Everyone ate it - success!
Please note that the replacement of an existing life insurance or annuity must not be made unless all factors are weighed and it is documented as suitable for the client.
The birds have long since left to a new perch. The worms will not make it.
2. Wrap the end of the section around two fingers and begin rolling in toward the scalp.
Ghostland Observatory
I was able to get six 20x20 unstretched canvas photos (without frames) for $45 from ArtsCow thanks to a coupon code. It took a few weeks to arrive but it was SO worth it. I took them to the local Hobby Lobby and had them framed. Now that I've seen how canvas is matted and framed, I'm certain I could do it myself. The employee was kind enough to let me watch her do several and showed me a few tricks of the trade.
I actually stitched it while feeding my toddler breakfast, so there is definitely still time to stitch one up for this weekend if you need something Eastery for yourself or as a hostess gift for whomever you are visiting!
So I decided that someday when I am a household name (insert rolly eyes) that people will likely have these misconceptions about me. So allow me to tell my 37 followers exactly who am: I wake up in the morning and if I’m going to work I think of ten thousand reasons to call off … though I rarely do, and if Ido it is because I am legitimately ill. If I go to work my day ends there. Now, days I have off are much more interesting: I wake up and try and try and try to fall back asleep because just once I would like to say I sleep in. Usually, I am awake by 630 am. If I am home alone then I pull the laptop from under my bed and proceed to follow this dreary routine: Check stats on home page, check stats on book trailer (close to two hundred views, yay!), check WordPress (no link necessary, right?), check email and wonder why I am being sent info about Viagra and who my new friend in Zaheer is and how much money he will send me today, proceed to delete all email except the ones with the coupons to Payless Shoe Source and Baja Fresh.
Build on Land – Lost During Last Pole Shift?
The flexibility and versatility is awesome. One minute I could be scolding a kid about his behavior and mentoring him, the next minute I could be in a foot chase or watching construction workers dig a hole in the ground.
At first, I was only writing in first person as the women (persona) or third person with the women as subjects. After several poems, this began to weigh on me. I switched to unexpected view points out of necessity. I was bored, and the book was going to be much too dark if every poem took you inside a jail cell or to the electric chair. I began to ask questions like, What does a jury really think about? What about their children? What about witnesses? I soon realized the new viewpoints told a fuller story.
I do want three dimensional characters and personal relationships in my comics. But not to the point where they get in the way of something as simple as Hulk beating the ever-living shit out of a villain. Characters and relationships are supposed to enhance comic book stories, not devour them whole. Why they felt the need to turn ever member of Hulk’s supporting cast into either a hulk, she-hulk or monster I don’t know. It doesn’t do the support characters any favors, nor does it do anything to enhance the main character which is the whole fucking point of a supporting cast.
6. Both vessels hit an iceberg on the starboard side in the North Atlantic 400 miles away from Newfoundland.
7. Jerky meat. If you do not care for beef, there is turkey, ostrich, emu, rabbit, horse, etc. I myself prefer buffalo jerky. If you are a vegetarian, this will only be for a short while and you will need the protein, especially if there is no electricty and cooking the above items proves difficult (perhaps a quick reference on how to build fires, and if you own a BBQ, stock up on charcoal and lighter fluid).
Before I get into my post today I'll update you on Kelly: She never called to drop by. But, I am glad I wrote about it because all the comments left were helpful. If she calls and wants to see me, my line will be "That won't work for me". As far as her making amends - I doubt that's the reason for her visit, she's never made amends when she was working a program, so I doubt she would now. I think she just wanted a ride home and if she stopped by here knew I couldn't say no. But....I can, it won't be easy, but I can.
So instead of throwing money into a lost cause, let's look at what our money can achieve today. Better support, better facilities and happy memories. Because we have a "hate list" we can turn it into a wish list. Let's look at what we don't like and see if we can make some progress.
temblando en el frío
If you approach a publisher with a completed book you cannot, by definition, get any Advance from them to tide you over while you write the book. You would have worked for perhaps two years for no money and you may have written what publishers don’t want.
The market for home electronics is booming, with hobbyists and electronics enthusiasts letting their imaginations run wild and creating new gadgets and prototypes by the dozen. Whether they are interested amateurs wanting to learn more about electronics, or engineers prototyping their new designs for commercial applications, these creative minds are using the most up-to-date components. In the last few years, a number of online suppliers have made it their business to source the most sophisticated components and starter kits to get electronics enthusiasts going.
Fire Chief Gary Lataille, in an interview with Rhode Island Catholic Wednesday at his office in Fire Station 2, which overlooks the memorial, said he has no plans to take any action at the request of the Freedom From Religion Foundation.
dan remarked on how he hasn't been to a concert
I also planted some Coriander seeds. Coriander also benefits from successional sowings so I will plant more in a few weeks. I planted a variety called “Leisure” which is an excellent variety for leaf production. If you want to grow it yourself, try to avoid buying plain coriander seeds as they are far more likely to bolt.
there's been a major moon shot
This is the music she chose for her recessional:
All across the curve of the earth within our lowly view, elephant bulls fed, grazed, slept, drank from pools, splashed in mud wallows; they greeted long lost pals, and moved away ahead of old adversaries. Summer is their time. Elephants prefer grass, and for now, there is an over abundance of sweet long waving grasses. The tensions of late winter months are gone.
Josh: But you're not bigger than me.
Due to key timing and sequencing of Horne’s delivery as well as skill and speed, Wacker was able to steal both second and third base successively within a matter of minutes, adding to the action in the bottom of the fouth. Maryland managed to turn the game around very quickly.
And so reclaim her trusting soul.
I found this old image by Joanna Sheen and thought it would be perfect for the Emboss Resist technique. I embossed it with white EP and sponged the background with different shades of orange, and of course I had to add some pearls:)
Mushroom picking. For years I'd wanted to indulge in this foraging fantasy, my mind filled with romanticised visions of skipping in a cool dark forest with a wicker basket tucked under my arm, stopping every now and then to pluck a large waiting mushroom to add to my spoils.
This just may be the smallest bathroom I've ever seen in a master bedroom.
Gangchil publications of West Bengal has become the outlet for a stream of life and migration stories from East Bengal. Published in Bengali, the continued presence of East Bengal in the metropolis that is Kolkata is exemplified by the following lines ( translated by the present author from the Bengali original) from a 4- volume memoir from Adhir Biswas. This particular volume is called ‘Amra to ekhon Indiaey’ ( We are now in ‘India’) -
I didn't feel the romance
Other films
collision and tumble,
#12 1968 Pryor Nunn (sp?) EP Coronado Discus 180'8"
I want cha
So here's me, wearing a mink. Ironically, yet practically. I feel glamorous in it. I like to toss it on the sofa at work, where it sits, like an uber-luxurious throw, and it shines in the dark Norwegian winter light. I totally get the appeal.
in July!
As part of the deal, Seacrest serves as a special correspondent for NBC News’ TODAY. He contributes to NBC primetime news and produces and contributes to NBC entertainment programming. Seacrest also contributes to NBC’s primetime coverage of the Olympics, beginning with the 2012 Summer Olympics in London.
Comedian Jimbo Bazoobi bills himself as “Australia’s crudest comedian” and, allegedly, used to be “Sydney’s most popular children’s party clown throughout the 1990s”. Also, according to Jimbo, goats have often been part of his performances and, last year, he traded a case of beer for Gary the Goat. Now they are “friends for life”. They have performed at almost 200 rural towns across Australia and have released a CD called Goats Need Love Too!
Info: Examiner
I believe you could use regular milk in this recipe.
And finally it's time to announce the guest designer as chosen by Amanda who we would love to have join us for Challenge #5, remember we will be choosing a GD with every new challenge so if you weren't successful this time there will be plenty more opportunities. So we would love to invite as our GD for Challenge #5....
Gas in the water supply often comes from leaks in the wells. According to industry figures reviewed by Cornell Professor Anthony Ingraffea about 5% of new wells leak while 50% will eventually leak. Once they leak, they leak forever.
“Masuzoe said that the source of infections in Japan remained unknown, and it was better to act on the presumption that the influenza has become widespread. He said it was important to ensure that the virus did not spread and that no deaths occurred. He added that closing schools early over a wide area was an effective measure, and asked for understanding from residents.”
I havent had much of a chance to bake lately, so really enjoyed it, even though it wasnt my best work. I think I will definitely try both recipes again – I already have a few ideas in my brain about other flavour combinations for the popovers, too.
Merry Christmas!!!!!!!!!!
SOURCES:
Vinyl Japan – DISCLP 8 - 1992
So yes, I was so freaking pissed off that I walked all the way to work since there were no jeeps during the time either.
Six hundred thousand doctors
He was then asked about the ever popular Ant-Man, and if that film had an update:
Not a day goes by that we are not so thankful that God allows us to be your parents.
or more
"I was shopping for our first dining room table before we even moved into our house (I took measurements when we walked through before making an offer). I needed a square or round table to fit the room which limited my options. I also wanted a table that was indestructible and we would have for the next 20 years. I almost bought a round pedestal table by Martha Stewart for Bernhardt but when I asked to salesman to lift up the table cloth, I saw scratches all over and the dark stain showed a ton of dust. No go. Whenever I’m in the midst of researching something I consider a “big” decision for our house, Jenny just happens to post the solution at the same time. I was getting a bit desperate to find a table and then Jenny wrote about Stable Tables . They had never shipped anything before especially not a 54 inch square table, but I used my favorite shipping service, uship.com and we were able to ship the table for only $150. The original table we chose was going to have the antique porch posts that were six inches in diameter, but when they went to prep them they found out the posts were rotten. So we went with these eight inch turned legs and I’m so glad we did. The only drawback is it’s hard to find chairs that will comfortably fit side by side and are easy to pull out.
Loneliness is one of the most serious and underrated afflictions in our society... all too often we have little idea of the people who live around us and all too often even less interest in attempting a small but meaningful one-to-one interaction.
“Geez Wolf, how would I know? I am just a dummy. What do you think?”
Conducted business mapping of government services across the Ontario Public Service to identify and implement opportunities for service integration and electronic service delivery
This theory is not an abstract threat but rather a very real one grounded in historical observations. The last solar Grand Minima was the Maunder Minimum (1645-1715 AD). During the 30-year period from 1672-1699 AD, there were less than 50 sunspots detected, whereas during the past century over the same period between 40,000-50,000 sunspots normally would appear. The Maunder Minimum corresponded to the depths of the Little Ice Age. Before that was the Spörer Minimum (about 1420 to 1570 A.D.). That Grand Minima was also noted for bone-chilling cold temperatures and was referred to as a Little Ice Age.
I thought I’d do some unscientific research and ask people: Do you click the links on social media and read the articles? Or do you just react to headlines?
* Truck Stop - Orange blossom special
2x: Factor by which the rate of sexually transmitted infections in the promiscuous segment of the general public exceeds that in streetwalkers (see also “160x” and “3-5%” above, and “0.4%” below).
And that wraps up Project Paper for January! Six easy peasy steps. A couple of days left until I will host our link party and you can all share all of your Project Paper work in all it's glory! I am super giddy excited to see all the organized eye candy, it sounds like many of you have been hard at work!
-That does it...squeaked Miss Moussie...whilst a tear rolled down her cheek and froze dangling on her nose...I must go on a search...My dear friends out there in the white wilderness...never fear..Miss Moussie is here..I'm on my way to rescue you....make way for The Snow Patrol....
The Video acceleration settings fоr the normal requirements wіll utilize a 3D graphics processor, this will include a Transform and Lighting feature inclusive of а sixty fоur megabytes Video Random Access Memory whіch іѕ sufficient to transmit high quality graphics. The ultra settings would be twiсe аs much, uѕіng a low of onе hundred and twenty eіght megabytes. These thrеe dimensional graphics cards act as a buffer betweеn the RAM аnd Video RAM to produce wеll screened images wіthin a quick time frame, not noticed by thе naked eye.
Well anyway, HI to whoever may still be following me!! I'm still here. The hurricane didn't sweep me, Mr. D or any of our belongings away. Kitties are well. New news: I'm going to be an auntie!!! Mr. D's sister is expecting in January and I am over the moon excited for them!! This kid is going to be spoiled by his auntie like crazy until we have one of our own :)
Teatime Oatmeal:
But it wasn't there.
A couple of small brass bells tied together with an organza ribbon in gold and a cut off piece from a Prima winter branch.
You have but to tell Him your troubles,
…and just where is the 68 THOUSAND DOLLARS in income tax we paid last year alone going?
Ellen Renner, whom I recently had the extremely good fortune to meet, has produced a wonderful, rich and gripping novel in City of Thieves. I absolutely loved it. The story has rich characterization, a powerful voice and vivid imagery. It reminded me in fact of another author, and it wasn’t until Ellen mentioned her favourite author that I realised who it was… None other than the wonderful Diana Wynne Jones. Although the two authors can’t be compared, there is no doubt about the influence of Wynne Jones on Ellen Renner, and all to Ellen’s benefit.
My husband likes to eat ramen when we go to Japan. When it’s hot outside, it’s refreshing to eat cold ramen! Thinking about it makes my mouth water. I found this “Hanabi” restaurant on a guide book. I had a warm ramen and shared it with my daughter. The soy base soup and the ramen noodles were an impeccable combination. This was actually my snack after my lunch which I had a couple of hours prior to this. We were jet-lagged, so we ate food at odd hours. Hanabi is located near Yuigahama station on the Enoshima Dentetsu. Yuigahama is the second stop from Kamakura. After you exit the station from the only exit it has, take a right and cross the rail road and keep going. You come to a T-junction with a stop light. Take a right. (Side note: If you turn to the left and keep going, you will come to the entrance of Hasedera Temple. To go to this restaurant, you’ll be walking away from the Hasedera.) About 100 meters (very rough guessing) from the T-junction, you’ll find the restaurant on your left. If you read Japanese, you can also check out this site.
The hysteria surrounding Ken Clarke's clumsy comments on rape overshadow a generally poor performance in convincing people his plans regarding crime and punishment are little more than an attempt to reduce the prison population and save money. It's not fair but people believe he is doing little more than continuing Labour's shocking policies that led to the release of thousands of prisoners early. There is more to it than that, but he's not done enough to convince people.
This worksheet is free, however it is only to be used for classroom and personal use. It may not be published on any websites or other electronic media, or distributed in newsletters, bulletins, or any other form or sold for profit. All graphics/images/clipart etc. used on this worksheet are not my own and are from various internet sources.
I’ve been a little obsessed with doilies and crochet for the past few months, so when the mirrors that the set decorator had created where covered I freaked out a little… they look like spiderwebs made from a grandmother’s fingertips.. I was so glad to spend a little time with Hanna, she makes the wildest nail art ever, and for the shoot, I got to wear her insane leather fake nails!
Fransman W, Roeleveld N, Peelen S, de Kort W, Kromhout H, Heederik D. Nurses with dermal exposure to antineoplastic drugs: reproductive outcomes. Epidemiology 2007; 18: 112-119.
The riddle of the sands,
Feel free to post your results in the comment section. I'd love to see what all of you wrote.
It's kinda fun.
I made this card for this week's QFTD112 challenge which honors Wanda/cullenwr. I designed my card around this card I found in her gallery. I used the SB layered poinsettia die and real red card stock, sponging with chocolate chip ink and adding a pearl button. The leaves were done with PTI new leaf green. The tag was made using the Cricut, stamping the Contempo Christmas sentiment with versamark and embossing with gold ep. I embossed the background using a Sizzix Snow Globe ef, and added a touch of gold cording to finish this one. Another Christmas card added to my stash - I love that I'm getting ahead so early this year with Christmas cards!
Then in Dreamweaver position the cursor where you wish the slideshow to be on the page, and click on the ‘Split’ option inbetween the ‘Code’ and ‘Design’ options to view the coding of the website and where there should be a stationary cursor in the coding, showing the same place as where the cursor was positioned in the design view. Click the stationary cursor and paste the coding copied from PictoBrowser, and a box will also appear with the link for the slideshow in the design section below. Preview the page on the internet and the slideshow will appear instead of the link.
"I'M NOT LOST. I KNOW EXACTLY WHERE WE ARE."
Blooming Teas
How cool would it be to have your very own magazine sitting on the tables around your next open house event?
The Crowfield Curse has just the right blend of everything – old magic, horror, suspense, thrills, fairies, monks and an orphaned boy with tremendous courage and compassion – and the Sight.
By about 11, though, I knew I was going to give in. I worked for this; I deserved this; I was damned-well gonna enjoy this. I bought a pack of Marlboro Black, feverishly ripped open the cellophane, ruthlessly tore out the golden paper and ripped out a fag. I looked at it, held it to my lips and, already, began thinking of the thick, slick flow of warm smoke that would gently caress my throat as it wound its merry way into my sadistically grateful lungs. I lit up. I sucked. I inhaled. Veni, vidi, vici.
I wonder if I can find some striped runners like these before the brunch?
If it comes to it, I will transcribe my latest re-do. It has a good story that I don't want you to miss out on. A story about contests, dancing, and pulling the "L" card when it's appropriate.
8) Nonni's Biscotti ~ I deserve it. I do. I really do. And I am going to enjoy it. Soon.
Here is Pin Up Candy – another of the beautiful retro models and artists in Poland. I let Candy present herself:
Ok, here goes. As you all remember, Cimiteria has a hunchback servant/lover called Quasimodo. After a visit to the Bermuda triangle and a subsequent rape by an alien from the planet of homosexuals, the poor little guy gets pregnant. Here are some snapshots from the family album:
Preheat oven to 210c/410f. Line a 12-cup muffin tin with paper cases or silicone cases.
07. Communication Breakdown
And bitter storme; which neither sea, nor land,
Happy birthday America.
Alice.
I want to send out a SPECIAL THANKS to our Friends who went the extra mile and helped with setting up and cleaning up - Kim, Jacqueline, Barbara and John and Bethany! Ben and Sam, my sweet boys, helped their Sister on her special day with loving hearts - kudos to you, guys! And, Rudy, you did an awesome ceremony and kept Matt calm.
Well, it was too late. We were on a stage which had curtains, they opened them and by that time you're committed. The guy became comatose halfway through the gig though, so he couldn't actually leave -- he slid down the bar and lay on the floor… probably just as well.
it is cold, soul dark
It was approved by the Green Bay school board Monday.
Our other guest teacher was College Park businessman Giovanni Vianello owner of “Let Us Frame It” on Edgewater drive. Mr. Vianello brought with him stories of his father growing food in the “old country”. Mr Vianello comes from Venice, Italy where his family has grown grapes for many generations. The grape plants shown here are actually grown from cuttings taken from the vines at the Vianello homestead and will hopefully provide many generations of OJA students with a taste of Venice.
Fort Collins Brewing Chocolate Stout
I don’t worry too much about the amount of cores I have when I’m in Windows. Games don’t really use more than one. Some do, but I don’t think anyone has made it past using two yet.
The family, the two sisters, were still there in the book which I liked. As it couldn’t really be part of the series without them. But what compelled me to read the story, aside from Lisa and Robert’s love story, was the mysterious suitor. You had no idea who the villain was through the book. Every suitor would be suspected. Eventually it gets narrowed down but it didn’t quite make sense and then Sands gives the reason.
This doesn't come easily to me.... the born worrier.
10Nor pass these lips in holy silence seal'd.
Brooklyn answered, "You have to pretend." Then she went back to the play kitchen and proceeded to eat all the real marshmallows herself.
* On-line judges will have 10 days to judge and turn in their scores to the Little Diva Tutus team. At that time the Little Diva Tutus team will judge the photographs.
Happy Wednesday !!!
In a large mixing bowl combine ground cranberries and sugar. Let stand for 5 minutes.
METHOD (Allow at least 3-4 hours depending on the cut of meat)
I agree!
** The smell of clean bed sheets and the smell of books!
He'll be at Percy Street Barbecue on Tuesday the 21st, with a crowd-sourcing approach for selecting a barrel of whiskey for Percy Street's own bottling -- as you'll soon see, an excellent chance to get right inside how Four Roses is made -- in which you'll taste whiskey samples from different barrels under consideration for the honor (PAYG).
It appears from the record in this case that upon November 30, 1914, the judge of the Court of First Instance of Iloilo, upon the petition and recommendation of Salvador Laguda, a practicing lawyer of Iloilo, named Cesareo Durban as a procurador judicial, with the right to appear in the courts of the justices of the peace in the Province of Iloilo as the representative of said Salvador Laguda, subject to certain restrictions which were set out in the appointment. So far as affects the question involved in this case these restrictions were that the said Durban should only be permitted to appear in matters signed and presented by the said Laguda with his own signature and when the latter should send the said Durban to attend to such matters; that the said Durban should have no authority to make contracts to represent any person in any justice court; that all contracts and appearances should be made by the said Laguda, and that the latter could send the said Durban to represent him in said courts; and finally that said Durban should not collect any sum for any service.
You laugh, but it's true. I am learning that home buying means compromise and choosing what's important to you and what you can live without. I'm not going to get my dream home at the age of 30. I will, however, get a home that is absolutely perfect for us and our growing family. It will be in a safe neighborhood with good schools and recreation facilities. Hopefully, we will have good neighbors with young families also. It's helpful to stay focused on the most important aspects of a home...
Oregon doesn’t have sales tax!
Born the King of Angels;
Those of us with Lyme Disease often take matters into our own hands, having little help from the medical community. We read blogs and are warned “this is not a substitute for expert medical advice.” Well? Sometimes “expert medical advice” is little more than “you’re depressed” or “you completed the course of antibiotics – you’re fine now!”
Clearly, I had lost sight of my goal. I'd forgotten that the most important thing to me was developing a positive relationship with my children and that the work was simply a means to that end. In the same way, Mormons (and, indeed, all kinds of people with the best of intentions) sometimes have a tendency to become so entrenched in service that we forget why we are doing it. The goal is not the service itself, but growing our relationship with our Savior.
Something I have decided I want to invest in are Tattler lids for canning. Especially since we are going to be utilizing our stores to rotate them I think it best to not be concerned about the cost of a lid when deciding what to eat.
Eliza was discharged Wednesday, and we were sent home with a suction machine. We've needed to lavage and suction her about twice a day. She is still having coughing fits, but is eating like a pig again, and is now 8 lb 9 oz. She gets a little pale after feeds, but no bluish tinge, so I am watching it.
Oh yes. I have an adorable Pomeranian named Tigger. He travels everywhere with us.
It's not comic. Transmogrified life's not for school, should only be penciled
Meanwhile in one of my former old stomping grounds of Exeter, the Liberty Taproom is getting ready to open at the old Nick's Chat A While at the corner of Prospect Street and Butter Lane. I could and did walk there way back in the day. If a place like that would have been there then, who knows how my beer history could have changed? Look for their soft opening by the beginning of June.
So 2012 has dawned on us very quickly and the blog is back in action. Since my last post the following amazing things happened to me ...
Hello friends and welcome back! I have some fun planned for ya today : D If you've read my last couple of posts, this will be somewhat of a review, but I'm sure you'll pick up a few ideas or maybe even have an 'a-ha!' moment lol!
Acts 27:29
official and “unofficial” live recordings, until Garcia’s death in 1995.
I have been TRYING to hold my regular Rally-O classes on Thursdays for the past month and a half now. In the summer, I like to hold my classes outdoors. There is a fabulous field near by that we have been given permission to use with the dogs. It cuts down on costs for me, so I can offer my classes a little cheaper than when I am training with Hub City. But nearly every Thursday since the beginning of June we have been hit with a thunderstorm or torrential downpour of some variety. Up until this week, I have only been able to have one class outdoors. The rest have either been postponed or moved to my fall-back indoor training facility. Reasonably priced, available at very short notice, but too small and not an ideal space for training.
The Scarlet Pimpernel!
Step 2: When the lotus seeds have softened sufficiently for handling, check each seed to make sure the germ has been removed from the center as this is very bitter. Also throw away any seeds that look discolored.
The spell was broken when I took my first standardized test. The teacher who’d previously threatened to take my brother’s book, who was struggling in reading, and give it to me, smacked my palm with a wooden paddle when the test scores came back. This was in the sixties when such things and much more were allowed. Anyway, she announced to the class that I didn’t perform well on the test. She was old and mean and constantly telling us, a room crammed full of mostly poor African American children, our faults. By the time I entered middle school standardized tests scared me more than being alone in the dark and the bogeyman combined.
Risk Assessment for Self Employed Borrowers:
Salamander Energy plc’s Deals Details, B8/38 30
Dust the surface with flour and roll the rolled dough so they are evenly distributed and you would get a perfect log shape, cut them into equal portions.
On the one hand, the Cabinet is said to have been divided on the caste issue when it was first raised following the announcement by Prime Minister Manmohan Singh on the floor or Parliament. On the other hand, the main opposition party, the BJP, which seemed to be in favour of the decision intially, is having second thoughts, too.
She also used additional bins above the changing table, to corral all sorts of additional baby necessities.
(b) Distinguish between the following:
Waterboys The whole of the moon UK
So lets see what happens!
Did someone put a bird in my hubbys ear? On Saturday he says, so I got a surprise for you, but I need your help, so it sorta ruins the "surprise" lol. I was a bit confused, but then he proceeds to tell me he has a babysitter lined up so we can go out on a date for Valentine's Day, but needs to know what day I want to go. We only had a couple to pick from, so Sunday night it was. He made reservations for PF Changs, yum! and we went and did a little shopping and came home and watched a movie. We had planned to go see a movie, but they all started at a time we couldn't make due to dinner and/or really late times. We have tons of movies on the DVR from last year (yes we're that behind lol) so we watched What Happens In Vegas. Oh my, what a funny movie. We laughed so much!
Rix LJ, giving judgment, was evidently sympathetic to this point of view, but the harsh realities of the situation forced a different conclusion. There was no legislation against the payment of ransoms (para 63) which was therefore not illegal. Nor was it against public policy. He noted, at para 67, that the “conflicting moral and public interest imperatives” were reflected in the deliberations of a recent report of the House of Lords European Committee Combating Somali
It was a conversation on "freedom" that called to mind that sentiment in the Kristofferson/Foster song (recorded so many times), "Me and Bobby McGee". The line is "freedom's just another word for nothing left to lose".
According to the institute, 30,000 people visit Switzerland every year for health reasons, spending in excess of CHF1 billion on treatment. Including family expenditure, Switzerland Tourism estimates that CHF500,000 of tourism spending derives from health tourism.
The new equation confronting us is –
how I was prepared to haunt you forever?
Forbid the birds, that prey on cultivated land,
My theory is that after a crappy day the sun always shines even brighter. I hope…
(and some surprises for me and Sampson!)
“I was very surprised in writing this to discover how much scientific evidence we have for the power of gratitude to improve mood. There’s two aspects to this. It’s feeling grateful and expressing it. And the good thing here, there’s nothing in the way of doing it. All you have to do is remember to do it. You know, forgiveness also has great power, but that’s tricky. There’s a whole lot in the way of being forgiving.
with the earth,
I'll try update this, after further quizzing my Mama.
Fruitful synergy, indeed, and really special work that enriches the catalogue, falling perfectly within the conceptual ambit of the label.
Joseph Smith is quoted in the book Teachings of the Prophet Joseph Smith, pg. 179 as follows; ‘The Saints have the privilege of being baptized for those of their relatives who are dead, whom they believe would have embraced the Gospel, if they had been privileged with hearing it, and who have received the Gospel in the spirit, through the instrumentality of those who have been commissioned to preach to them while in prison.’
Although he's always up to something - like stealing plant pots out of the greenhouse because they are his new favourite toy, it's really hard to be mad with him at all because he is so cute - and also because of his past. As a puppy he's never been allowed to explore the great outdoors as much as he has since he's been with us. He's now at his true home.
It was decided quite early on that as the bathroom is tiny, like really really tiny, we would rather have a shower in there to replace the bath and also gain a bit of room. We gained a little bit of room, not alot as we also went for a bigger vanity...haha....it is a small bathroom but it had to be sorted and maybe at a later date it might get added on to. The girls are happy with it and if the girls are happy then we are happy :)
laying him down in a corporate coffin
When you are going to buy any running shoes, it is very important that you know the type of foot you have. Meaning you should know if you are an underpronator, a moderate pronator or an overpronator. The pronation of your foot is one of the most important things to consider because this can affect your running performance. If you wear the wrong footwear for your foot, you can have painful foot injury. Some runners end up buying lots and lots of footwear because they are complaining about their painful foot without realizing that they wear the wrong shoes. Everyone should understand that there is specific footwear for different sports activity so you should be careful in buying your running shoes.
Anyway, Sensa is a mythical, magical powder made from the dust of Unicorn tears (that part may or may not be true) that you sprinkle on your food. You eat what you want, with the Sensa sprinkled on top, and you magically lose weight! Poof! The weight is gone! How exciting is that?
33. What kept you sane?
I think in traditional parenting, if the mama has something to do, she just makes the child do it to (with fighting, battles, kicking, possibly screaming and such - it is THEIR agenda!)
. . . you know what I mean.
like Rachel and Leah,
*G-20 WILL ACT TO MAINTAIN FINANCIAL STABILITY, GROWTH: BAROIN
This customer wanted a book case for her daughter's room, one that she could add baskets to for toy storage. She looked all over my shop and these were the specifications she gave me...She said, "I love this painted stool...
she's flown to other shores
Most of the popular posts on this blog will be transferred, so the difference shouldn’t be too severe, other than I’m going be Elisa Nuckle not Elisa Michelle and I’ll be a bit more casual with my tone in posts (as if I wasn’t already). This blog really helped me figure out what in the world I needed to do as an not-quite-yet author when it comes to social media. I’ve narrowed the list down quite a bit and believe social media should be used only to interact with friends and readers, not really to self promote , aside from passively via links and the occasional post or tweet.
light, sweet and sharp. The scent has light notes of lemon and verbena, and a grounding base note of patchouli. Think lemons and the blue Mediterranean Sea. ELLA Day is a lively perfume for the modern, energetic woman who leads by example and charms without effort. (size 100 ml/3.4 oz)
Allow each of your children to pick out one (or more!) item each at the grocery store to contribute to the local food pantry.
Back in the liquor store, though, my unenlightened self isn’t thinking about psychology, or the philosophical definition of forgiveness—I’m just thinking: How can I escape? I want to escape notice (probably too late, damn it); escape judgment (naturally this had to happen before I’ve lost all the weight, before I’ve gotten back to where I was before I married him, and on a day when I haven’t even brushed my hair); and escape punishment. My unenlightened self isn’t even remotely thinking about letting go and moving on—it’s just hightailing it for the back of the store, where it hides behind a tall display of piña colada mixers, peeking around a coconut as the nice-looking old man twists the top of his small brown paper sack like he’s wringing the neck of a chicken, and makes his exit.
After years of hard work, you’ve made your way through your organization’s ranks and have finally received the recognition you deserve by getting the promotion you’ve been dreaming of. And after many years of being overworked and under-appreciated by managers, you vow, “When I become the boss, I am not going to make the same mistakes my supervisors made and treat my employees the way I’ve been treated.”
Heart Breaker
“Solitude, says the moon shell.”
in almost every context of the word
So I got up and went to the couch. Sitting on the footrest was the latest cross stitch project I've been working on. It hadn't been touched since sometime last week. I can't even remember when I started it? I picked it up and worked on a little flower. In no time at all, I felt my body and spirit relaxing. I realized I was holding my entire body slightly UP and in a very unusual and stiff way. I was wound up TIGHT. If you touched me, I probably would have zapped you with a long, blue, electric arc. But after a half hour of stitching, I was much more calm. Even the kittehs seemed more relaxed. Collectively, we were detoxing. And after I made some good stitching progress, I made myself go lie back down and try to sleep. Eventually, I did.
Sunday morning coffee, moss, and a card!
1 Sept 2009: Minister releases the final report of the National Preventative Health Taskforce recommends plain packaging as part of a comprehensive package of measures to make Australia the healthiest country in the world by 2020.
ENEMY CAMP 2010 is an episode of This American Life that focuses on people working behind enemy lines, or against former allies. It is very interesting. Sometimes TAL can be hit or miss, and this time, I thought Act I was definitely a hit. In their own words:
fan of a firm thigh or you prefer a succulent breast a tender chick is always a more-than-welcome lip-smacking culinary delight.... you've realised we're not talking about poultry here right? Ok, good.
Honour: The couple will each receive a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame
Thursday, May 10; 10:30 AM – 11:45 AM
point...I mean some bank manager might get demoted, or a cleaner might get laid off, -
of what we'd like to say.
Finally, I am on to my first post of the day… of the year! This is very exciting.
I love Fox Mulder. And chocolate cream pies. And the Penguins when they come back to win hockey games.
Rest In Peace MCA!
The camcorder revolution is happening with the introduction of high definition HDD video camcorders. JVC HDD camcorders, with great performance capacity, are among them.
"You'd better watch out and stop eating chocolate," my boyfriend said helpfully, "otherwise that'll be you soon."
She is the author of several books and her writing has been featured in numerous publications — most recently on SparkPeople.com.
Roses bloom again this year,
Now, after a decade of struggle to learn the craft of writing, Ken has become the publishing world's latest overnight sensation.
Bonus points will be awarded for being able to name where the question is from. You can google every thing if you really want, (I can’t set my were-bear on you, since my hunting with were-bears license has been suspended as punishment for their unfortunate uncontrollable rampage after an accidental viewing of Batman and Robin), but it won’t really accomplish much. If you really need the self-esteem boost, though, go for it. Post answers in the comments, or just follow along at home. Good luck and big balls!
I spent this weekend in Gettysburg at the Tri-regional SCBWI conference. I had a great time, refueled my writing bucket, and met so many wonderful people. Okay, that sounds trite, but it's true.
I’m close to the mountain, just miles away
Do you have good examples of communities coming together or ideas that you think we should get involved in?
There comes a point where you need a break. Thankfully, I have a very supportive husband who more than once took over when he came home from work so I could get some rest.
They’re relationship didn’t last but the memory of that evening was perfect. Looking back….I wouldn’t have done anything different.. Epic Trey logan FAIL?.......Not today.
the berry-blue mass of sky.
Thanks for taking a peak. Hope everyone had a lovely weekend. We're supposed to get some rain here Tuesday, and boy does California need it, again. They say it's going to be a very wet spring this year. I sure hope so, as winter didn't bring much at all!
Now sail Gunnlaug and his fellows into the English main, and come at autumntide south to London Bridge, where they hauled ashore their ship.
In 1994, Allison Anders was gearing up to direct Paul Is Dead from an autobiographical screenplay with Hugh Grant lined up to star. Then, a month before the start of filming, the actor pulled out and with it the financing, which was contingent on his participation. Understandably upset, Anders was woman without a film. In stepped Martin Scorsese who had written a fan letter to Anders after seeing Gas Food Lodging (1992). He was eager to team up his then girlfriend and actress Illeana Douglas with Anders for a film that he would produce. After making Cape Fear (1991), Douglas had acted in but was ultimately cut out of a string of impressive films: Jungle Fever (1991), Husbands and Wives (1992), and Quiz Show (1994). Feeling depressed as a result of these snubs, she talked to Scorsese who recommended she start developing relationships with directors. Douglas went on to make a low-budget film called Grief (1993) and went to the Sundance Film Festival with it. There, she met Anders and they became friends. Afterwards, the two women kept in contact in the hopes of making a film together.
Here at Mordue we are soon to release our first Panda Frog beer to the public as the Pandazilla cascadian dark ale brew date is getting closer and closer, it sure is gripping stuff. It sure will be interesting to see the public response.
I had a moment of experimentation today in the kitchen. A friend who suffers from gallstones and is on a lowfat, lowsugar diet wanted/craved something sweet. So I decided to have a bash at finding something even she can enjoy and after talking to her about what she could/couldn't include I have come up with the following.
Later, I will show you how to knit back, so that the same side of the work always faces you...
● THE DISTRACTION: $165 MILLION AIG BONUSES allowed by the so-called Stimulus bill
Taking over from a previous actor in a series of films is always going to be difficult but Mark Ruffalo takes over the role of Banner with ease, he plays the timid doctor well enough that the difference in actors isn’t noticeable.
Normally at this time, Claire and the Waltzingmouse DT members would be previewing new stamp sets for release. However, there will be no release this month in order to allow Claire time to focus on a few "behind the scenes" plans that will take us to the next level in the new year.
I wonder where i am
The entire contents of my kitchen, along with the rest of our stuff, are packed and will soon be making their way across the Atlantic ocean. We have been told the shipment could take up to 90 days to arrive! During that time, we will be searching for somewhere to live. This is where the possibility of a temporarily neglected blog comes in. I won't have the equipment I need to cook until we find a home and our belongings have arrived. All I'll have is a suitcase full of clothes, my laptop, my camera equipment and my husband.
Automatic Bid: Southern Conference Champions
reminding me of my aunt Lina,
On the negative side the gluten and lactose free cheese I bought, the Vegan American Soy Slices were horrible. It claims it is for melting, but it didn’t even come close to melting when I tried to make an egg sandwich last night for dinner. It resembled squares of yellow construction paper in physical appearance and taste…..believe me, this cheese is dreadful.
People are emailing the letter's author (address in the heading) to make their views known, and some people are also emailing their MPs.
I'm still in shock. I can hardly believe we have four little girls. A clothing catalog arrived in the mail and I started looking through the boys clothes and then remembered that I didn't need to g0 there. I thought for sure I'd have to start collecting little boys clothes. It is amazing to me that I'm wrapping Julia up in the same receiving blankets that I got as a gift from my neighbor when Amanda came home. I had no idea then what my life would look like now. It looks pretty pink and sweet, don't you think?
To Learn More About My School:
1 p.m. – Sunroom Cafe: Intimate Dialogues – Chamber Solos and Duets. Works by Robert Honstein, Greg Steinke, and Hans Werner Henze.
- One prize per household
With my brother’s assistance,
Right now all I can show you is this gem I used to own as a child:
What's new this month? AWARD CUISINE. These look delicious! They come in a 32 oz pouch and are $10.99 each...Chicken and Broccoli Alfredo, Classic Pot Roast, Philly Cheese Steak, Southwest Chicken, and Cheese Tortellini Alfredo. You can locate these items on the back of the latest Alison's Pantry flyer.
I pick up my bags (which for the first time in ages no man offers to help with - not that I need it - it's just a little touch of North America that I miss) and head for the parking lot. Twenty minutes later I am in the car, radio on, windows down, heading to the country. Tomorrow the jetlag will hit and I will come back to the real world (ie read the news), but today I love being back in North America.
I ordered up prints of our son and his two cousins. The original plan was to do four total smaller frames - one for each of the three grandchildren and an extra one for any additional grandchild, but the 8x10 frame ended up looking much better with just the two frames, so we decided to put our son on one side and my BIL's children on the other. If any additional grandchildren enter the picture, it's easy enough to change out the photos.
And I watered it in fears,
Bob is one of the smartest guys in the business. His thoughts are not obscured by fads, what's au courant or quotidian bs. He is a straight-shooter. Honest, to the point and fact-based. Qualities sorely missing in the world today.
It did not answer the question “what happened?”
Cherry Lynn - Cutting Die -Victorian Picket Fence
So then we get to see Pinhead again; how nice of them to give him two cameos in the same movie! He puts chains in Trevor’s face and body and reveals to him what really happened: apparently Trevor was actually an asshole all along who was cruel to Kirsty and cheated on her with a bunch of women, ALSO aspiring to kill her for her money on the side! I love how shocked she is about all of this stuff; it’s like, if a guy was doing THIS MUCH BAD STUFF behind your back, wouldn’t you be able to catch on just a little bit? I guess the answer was no. So she pointed a gun at him and they drove off the cliff, where he died instantly and she was able to get out and survive.
‘I really think we should get going before he comes back. I don’t want Stacey to know just yet how big an idiot he is.’ Jason joked as we walked slowly along the brick path we’d come through.
When Lincoln took the oath of office on March 4th, 1861, he was President of a divided nation. Seven states had already seceded from the Union, and formed the Confederate States of America. Although the Republican Party was against slavery, Lincoln was not for abolition at this time. In his inaugural address, he repeated his previous statements about his wish to only prevent the expansion of slavery to the new territories, and not to bother it in those places where it already existed. But he also promised he would defend the Constitution he was sworn to uphold, and that it was in the hands of the South, and not his, that the “momentous issue of civil war” existed. He would not start the war, unless the south started it first. But by the time of his second inaugural address four years later, he would have overseen the bloodiest conflict in American history.
Banner dies- Whiff of joy
Jump Race Record – Starts: 24; 1st: 4; 2nd: 8; 3rd: 4; Win & Place Prize Money: £110,459
So that’s the books I’m most looking forward to for the rest of the year. Are any of them on your wish list? Which books are you pining for that I’ve forgotten about? I’m always happy to add more to my wish list lol.
Sealed is a format where players are given a number of boosters to open. With these cards you need to create your own deck, you don’t need to choose a hero at the start. The best thing to do here is look at the cards you have, see how they could work together and after that you can say which hero you take. It’s a good way for beginning players to start, as they get to keep the cards they received from the boosters. Also the more experienced players don’t have the upper hand because they need to play with these cards as well.
Despins describes the period with fondness: “We started going to the cinema. I loved the French New Wave, I loved the way they were shot so spontaneously, or at least gave the impression of spontaneity.” This being the 1960s, the European Art Movie was at its height, with new films from Fellini, Bergman, Antonioni, Truffaut, Godard, Resnais and many others regularly filling theatres. Despins recalls that there were two opposing camps at the time: “There were two schools – Antonioni and Fellini – and I was always very much on the Fellini side! I felt, rightly or wrongly, that Antonioni was more cerebral, more measured, whereas I just liked Fellini's joie-de-vivre. That wonderful scene in 8½, the woman Saraghina, when she comes out and dances, you know - Life!” British cinema was going through its ‘kitchen sink drama’ phase, towards which Despins felt ambivalent: “I enjoyed Saturday Night and Sunday Morning, Karel Reisz, Tony Richardson. I would go the cinema a lot but I wasn't so enamoured or obsessive about the films that were more political. We were kind of living in our little cocoon, and it didn't involve class, so the whole class obsession that we felt there was in Britain didn't touch us. But we were sympathetic to them - we understood. I come from quite a poor background in Canada, so I feel that my position politically is always going to be for the have-nots rather than the haves. Neither Bill nor I felt we were really part of the 'swinging' London scene, we just missed out at our age, but I thought it was fantastic. When we first arrived I used to see the suits that were being sold in the shops and they were just so fuddy-duddy. There was a sense of something static, and suddenly there was an eruption. There was without doubt going to be progress, and things were never going to be the same again.”
Snipers!
Why, none other than our favorite girl Kane who we hear has found himself a new hunting mate. One to do the dirty, the other to act as bait.
The statute does not describe any limitation on the scope of the CPC.
‘All I know is that Anthony woke up and he said the man had his hands round his neck and that someone must have pulled him off, and then they took him off.
It’ll either be Food of the Gods, Give it to the Dogs, or simply ... Meh.
The discussion of infringement in the subsection on patent rights covered the responsibilities of the parties in case of infringement suits brought by third parties against the licensee. In spite of any warranty disclaimers, the licensee should at least negotiate for some indemnification against any damages he may have to pay to a third party. An offset equal to a percentage of the royalties paid to the licensor up to the time of settlement of the third party suit is one such solution; a temporary reduction in future royalties until all or an agreed-upon portion of the damages is paid is another. The licensor should not reject such a position summarily. Addressing the matter in this manner will most likely preclude a less favourable court or arbitration judgement should an incident be litigated or arbitrated.
-Louvre bright and early to beat the crowd, right when it opened. We even went to the “secret” entrance between the 2 lion heads, where it was barely a line. Also, best part about studying abroad for a semester with a Danish permit resident card and being a Paris – the discounts! Got into Louvre for free! Hit up most of the major artworks, and I saw so many that looked like they came from my 9th/10th grade humanities book! It was really really cool! And I think the Mona Lisa is overrated…
yay for cynthia!!!
Now, concentrate on the black " + " in the center of the picture. After a short period, all the pink dots will slowly disappear, and you will only see only a single green dot rotating.
I just stashed all my fears and put it out there. I published my book as an e book. I am now a self-made author. I thought I'd feel more ashamed of myself, but I don't really. I'm actually kind of excited.
hall.
The following year, a study by the association even suggested that carbon trading could be an advantage for some international airlines. The I.A.T.A. said this week that that study had been carried out before the organization knew airlines would be required to buy allowances over other states’ airspace.
So, tonight I've been browsing on eBay. Yes, don't worry, the irony of this is not lost on me. What goes out must come back in for the consummate hoarder.
I'm like," no why?"
Souvenir de la Malmaison
Fehrnstron, and this is unusual for a Republican, got me thinking. I thought about how often clients and agencies act as if their marketing communications can be shaken up and restarted. Wiped out with no trace left behind. Previous campaigns, previous viewers can be erased or lobotomized--wiped clean from our memories.
Lyrics to Neil Young's "Fork in the Road" Performed in January 2009:
I brought up my own son to love books, in the mid 1980s but as soon as he started school he refused to do anything, as he had to bark his way through a matchbox full of words before being allowed near the sacrosanct "Reading Books."
We had a great time and hopefully we can continue the tradition. Thanks to everyone
When it comes to editing, Horowitz says: "I'm sure there are some very good self-published books out there and this may well be one of them – anyway, who am I to say? - but my feeling is that in some indefinable way, having a publisher raises the bar."
Brian Hughes
Tutoring is wonderful because it works completely around my schedule. I ask my husband how his schedule looks for the week, and when I can tutor, and we fit it in.
The St. Paul City Council voted Wednesday to pay $86,500 to a man who won a police brutality case in federal court.
Having baking as passion, sometime can lead to wastage. Attempt to try new recipes always ended up with left over of whipping cream, sour cream, yoghurt and blah blah blah. The list is pretty endless. I am not sure how you feel, but to me, it is a heart pain throwing them away.
Town score on the stroke of half-time. Our sense of injustice chooses to ignore the fact that they had already hit the post and bar. Former Burridge striker, Stuart Seaborne, wrestles free of Kev Willsher, and strokes past Ryan Jones, as he did in the previous game.
A distant memory brightened his face, if only for just a moment.
According to Dr. Hew Len, who have managed to heal violence patients in Hawaii State Hospital described that he do not heal them, instead he healed part of himself that created them (the patients).
First, for the bags, I used clip art. This is a great option. There are many sites online for free clip art. For the Princess' pillow, however, I used one of my own drawings. I simply scanned it into the computer and saved it as a JPEG file.
“Many of the bodies are in such poor condition that officials said they are using fingerprints, medical records, distinctive tattoos, DNA and other methods to identify them.”
Sondra recommended the doctor who was with her on the medical missions trip to Haiti when she met her son. He has done an excellent job of caring for Sondra's boy, since they've been home and she felt like he'd be a good fit. I called about a month ago and asked for a consultation and that's where Marty and I found ourselves, yesterday. In a consultation room, where we waited to meet Dr. S. for the first time. His degrees were hanging on the wall and Marty was happy to see that he started his career in service to his country. His initial training was received while he served in the US Navy. He went on to receive many other degrees. Very educated and well-trained on paper.
Four solid stars.
i love children. i love that they are this sweet. that they are innocent
Snow is coming down and Buddy is one very content, not-so-little-anymore puppy. He has always liked shoving his nose deep into its cold fluffiness again and again as though he has just discovered the greatest thing on earth. He finds particular pleasure in tossing one of his babies up into the snowy air, catching it and then running around madly just to do it all again. And again. It's the stuff happy is made of.
Inside the manila envelope was an 8×10 picture of his best man having sex with the bride. (He must have gotten suspicious of the two of them and hired a private detective to trail them.) After he stood there and watched people’s reactions for a couple of minutes, he turned to the best man and said Fuck You; he turned to the bride and said Fuck You, and then said I’m out of here.
“I was thinking the exact same thing. In fact I think you could go so far as to say he's a double stalwart.”
I didn't buy really much yesterday, we only went to let our extensions be done. Really inexpensive! only 11'000 yen, Exte Ichiban! It's great, in Shibuya!
Break the magic...
4) The belief that there is no God is thus based on blind faith alone since no evidence of his non-existence exists.
Annabel. What can I say? She sleeps at night. Wakes to eat usually just once and takes a nice long morning nap. She is terrible in the car. My first child who wasn't instantly calmed my a nice car ride. Oh well. She sleeps at night. I can't complain.
In HIDDEN, the main character Alix has agreed to help hide an illegal immigrant until an organisation can be contacted to provide legal advice. But the police are aware that illegals are trying to come into the local beaches. They turn up at Alix's house one day and start questioning her. She hates lying to the police but she doesn't like the way one policeman barks at her and then the other one speaks nicely. She dubs them 'Good Cop/Bad Cop' like in the TV shows.
And when we got back to the office, my co-worker had prepared pans of 'dirt' that had hidden treats in it, and there were little front loaders to drive through the delicious 'dirt'.
Confusion, anxiety, resistance, frustration, hard work with no results, and inertia. Now, there is a recipe for discomfort. And, it’s real. We’ve experienced such discomfort. We know it, relate to it, recognize it, and fear it.
Back in 2009 I acquired the wooden bowl shown here in this picture. At the time I received it I was not decorating my house in the prim style. So I gave it to my friend to put in her shop. It never sold so she gave it back to me when she had to close the shop last year for health reasons. It sat for a long time in my attic cause I didn't have a place for it. Well last year at my family reunion we had a Chinese auction and I needed an item to put in the auction well guess what I put up for auction. Yep you guessed it the wooden bowl. Of course at the time I didn't think I'd need it but now I could kick myself because I could use that bowl. I've done some redecorating and have the perfect spot for this bowl. Oh Why Oh Why did I ever get rid of it? So now I am on a mission to find another one. Guess that means I'll be visiting several Good Wills and Thrift stores.
By creating a genuine, motivational environment where employees can be helped to discover what it is about them that makes them the most effective people – not just effective workers – you’ll be strengthening your peoples’ skills that they can apply, not only on behalf of your company, but in all areas of their lives.
They also have a text-version, which is handy for referencing back after watching the animation (easier random access).
~ By Julie Breedlove, Marketing Manager
Remember that Ford reneged on the deal made with the unions on our behalf in 2009 too - and it is costing the Unite union hundreds of thousands of pounds in legal fees to prove this. Luckily we have many former union shop stewards etc in VPAG including Other Half who commenced his Father of the Bride speech at Youngest Daughter's wedding two weeks ago with the words 'Usually when I address this many people I am calling a strike'! Their skills have not been wasted and the skills gained are being used for this ultimate industrial action."
I found this manga absolutely fascinating. The stories are all episodic. Each manga has two ikigami recipients and the only connecting factor is Fujimoto as he struggles with his doubts. What makes this series intriguing is the twisted way the National Welfare Act seems to work for a lot of people. While tragedy may strike as the ikigami recipients all react differently, sometimes quite violently, the aftermath is usually positive as the survivors that were affected by the eventual death usually do make positive changes in their lives, to make up for the loss. However, to me, this is an obvious case of “the ends do not justify the means.” Guaranteed death determined randomly (at least so far; it’ll be interesting to see if there is something not so random in the system) is a frightening concept.
One last post,
He needn’t have worried. Nicola behaved as nothing unusual happened between them. She gave him a perfunctory peck on the cheek and didn’t complain when he said he had to work that evening. She was going to see their new neighbour for a chat, his dinner was on the stove, ready to eat.
As great as all those things are, the most important aspect of my happiness falls directly on the fact that I am content and happy with myself as a person. There is no better feeling to have.
We are all meant to shine, as children do.
Why would this vile woman falsely demonize our war veterans?
Clever schoolchildren have a much higher risk of suffering from bipolar disorder than less intelligent pupils, according to new research.
It’s not that we’re going to use the newly-uncovered fireplace. But it’s nice to have it out in the open.
UFO Disclosure is imperative to the entire humanity,
Motor vehicle accidents are a relatively frequent event in Mauritania: road infrastructure is incomplete; many roads are poorly maintained; long stretches of road lack adequate lighting. Many of the inevitable accidents which occur under these conditions are serious and often fatal.
“A lot of times people feel that the face of homeless is that man they see on the street corner,” he said. “Really the true face of homelessness is children.”
My mother asked Jovita about it, only to have Jovita reply that she didn't know what a hysterectomy was, and that she'd never been sick in any way. My mother asked her about menopause, and Jovita answered that, a year or two after my father been born - when she was just 30 - all the woman in her neighborhood in San Juan had been ordered to a government clinic. She'd been seen by a doctor, and told that she'd need to have surgery. The reason for the surgery was never explained to her. Her permission was never asked for. She hadn't been sick. She'd been ordered, by doctors sent by the U.S. government, to have surgery. They were doctors. They were with the government. Of course she trusted their judgement. The next thing she knew, she was recovering from this mystery surgery that had left a large scar. The doctors told her not to climb stairs or lift anything heavy, and that she would be just fine. They hadn't told her anything else. They hadn't mentioned that her periods would stop, or that she'd never be able to have another child. They hadn't mentioned that they'd ripped her uterus out in a government-sanctioned effort to keep the women of Puerto Rico from breeding.
Why the fuck are the victims named, but not the pigs who helped contribute to someone’s death?
After a leisurely breakfast, we caught the metro towards Chandi Chowk and the Red Fort. The Red Fort was a massive complex of white stone building surrounded by an impressive red stone wall. As we wandered the grounds we began to notice that the locals kept sneaking photos and videos of us and following us around.
So, now I can't wear my glasses...which means I can't really see all that well, so who knows what I'm really typing here...AND we're right in the middle of Cedar Fever season here, so I'm having to blow my nose about 62,000 times every day--OUCH!
For we hope in God, that he will soon have mercy on us and gather us together from everywhere under the heavens to his holy place, for he has rescued us from great perils and has purified the place.
"Did you let the minister know you found them?" I asked.
Add contents of bag plus 2 cups of water to slow cooker. Cook on low for 8 hours.
I've been an avid follower of your blog for a while now. Nothing quite makes me happier than organizing the things in my life. For me, it's relaxing. However, I've probably spent time on your blog that I *should* have been spending our new 'fixer upper' by the beach. :)
Weight: 9 lb 2 oz (31%)
And aping them in flight.
Mid Bought In: 0
As the NY Times reports, "compressed music files produce a crackly, tinnier, and thinner sound than music on CDs."
The Final Exam is also not on the 4th – again the UNIVERSITY (NOT ME) is responsible for the final exam schedule – so your best response would be to check with the university, department of economics,the registrar’s office or the website.
‘I don’t have one. I’m one of those guys. Last one I bet, right?’
3/4 tsp salt
To begin, Stacee showed me a quick video of the nursery.
So, errrrm you could say I'm pretty cheesed. Now all I'm gonna say is this: We're supposed to be friends man! I don't know WHO exactly it is, but *somebody* who comes up into my house is leaving with more than they came in with. Now I know times are hard, but hey, if things are *that* bad, and we're friends, can't you just *ask* for help? Let's not forget that when you do come, you're coming with a family of five who are hungry and often without warning! Hell, if I'm gonna be a gracious hostess, at least let myself or the Mister know you're bringing your clan! Humph!
I love fashion photography and it’s what I think I want to do when I leave school. However, today I was looking through the photos that I took when I was on holiday in France and I quite like some of the pictures.
And I was right. When I rose from my sick bed, I awoke to several eggs having been cracked on the floor, even though I had locked the food storage room door where we keep them. (They've apparently learned to quietly move stools around.) I was also confronted with spilled water on the couch, sidewalk chalk thrown and broken all over the kitchen, and a few water-balloons broken on the floor.
Apparently, a string of tampon machine thefts is plaguing the Michigan State University campus of late. The campus rag, The State News, is reporting the destruction and theft of money and perhaps content, of numerous tampon machines placed in women’s bathrooms.
Max is doing very well. He still loves school and is making a lot of progress. Unfortunately, he has been sick for most the winter season so far. He ends an antibiotic and is back on one a few weeks later. We are dealing with some pretty nasty mouth sores right now. His pediatrician originally said they were canker sores, but they are spreading so I am not to sure if that's what we're dealing with or not. I am actually waiting for a call from nephrology as I type this. The poor guy is in a lot of pain though, so I am hoping to get something figured out before Christmas so that he can enjoy his gifts from Santa.
Speaking of Random . . .
Shea KM, Little RE. Is there an association between preconception paternal x-ray exposure and birth outcome? The ALSPAC Study Team. Avon Longitudinal Study of Pregnancy and Childhood. Am J Epidemiol 1997; 145: 546-551.
The film starts with Thor’s brother and villain Loki (Tom Hiddleston) teaming up with the Chitauri alien army for his invasion of Earth and steals Tesseract that was seen crashing with Captain America (Chris Evans) into the ocean. Loki puts Hawkeye (Jeremy Renner) and Dr. Erik Selvig (Stellan Skarsgard) under his spell and sweeps away before the entire facility is destroyed. Meanwhile, Nick Fury (Samuel L. Jackson) heading S.H.I.E.L.D. assembles the Avengers. Whedon introduces his superheroes one at a time and then make these superheroes battle each other. Thor takes on Iron Man, and then Captain America, Hulk takes on Thor and the Black Widow before they all find a way to get along and save the world.
We have all been there: the company’s office with its brave new mission statement proudly displayed on the reception wall; the departments with posters on the pillars extolling the business’s values alongside stock photographs of happy, shiny customers or attractive business colleagues creatively and cooperatively brainstorming. How frighteningly familiar are the words we see: ‘commitment’, ‘individuals’, ‘listening’, ‘understanding our customers’, ‘delivering their needs’, ‘number 1 choice’. What does it all really mean… ?
I hope if there ever is some sort of zombie apocalypse I'm wearing an outfit like this. I think I really would embrace the end of the world and kick more ass and survive a little longer if I was properly outfitted like a bad ass. Or I'd just develop a wicked yeast infection on Day 2, feel sorry for myself and let a zombie eat my brain.
(1) J. Todd Ormsbee. The Meaning of Gay: Interaction, Publicity, and Community among Homosexual Men in 1960s San Francisco. Lanham, MD: Lexington Books, 2010.
For everyone who wishes they had bunkered more Stitzel-Weller wheated bourbon before it was all gone, here are a few ideas about what to buy now.
I can't mention anything about what the club is doing on Sunday I don't think it's sorted out yet. I know some of the guys read this and might email me with what they want to do, but as yet nothing is decided.
Remember my quest to recreate the walnut rolls of my youth? These came very, very close to the right texture and sweetness! I think I would just need to omit the cranberries, substitute in a little bit of whole wheat flour, and knot up the rolls, and I'd be dang close to the original.
last October. Newport Beach was truly Magical!
So in eternal gratitude, here you go, behold our “Chris-Bohjalian” chick. She is a Golden Comet and will be a mid-sized bird. Golden Comets chicks are color sexed; females are red and white and males are white. Alas, if you’ve followed our rooster debacle you know that there will be no more male chicks for us but not to worry, our red and white “Chris Bohjalian” bird is a plucky little chick who looks out for her other tiny siblings and is already proving to be an asset to the flock. She sports an interesting striped pattern on her head (unlike her plain headed sisters) and when she is ready she’ll be producing beautiful brown eggs.
Unfinished Work (Updated Sunday night to add that Dianne has just unveiled her new look tonight, and she tweaked it herself!)
Sue has been very busy. She is planning her wedding. She has adjusted to her new responsibility as a nurse and may take some additional classes. She works most weekends and on her days off she volunteers to help at Monica’s class. I am sure that is the reason she was unable to send me any photos for their Easter celebration. I love my daughter with or without photos.
If you've fallen off the wagon, then get back on! It's as easy as that.
I vote for shutting down the federal government, after all, they got us into this mess.
This video clip certainly started the brain cells pondering. It reminded me that dandelions appear almost everywhere and once there is one it won’t be long before it multiplies and it is hard to get rid of. Dandelion and bee video. The airborne seed heads may contribute to this – but then of course this emphasises that the dandelion doesn’t rely on the honeybee for pollination.
We are now working as part of a city-wide eLearning Team, with the primary ICT consultants and colleagues from the other CLCs in the city. The South CLC based on the site of Newfield School will remain open, and we hope to continue working with our partnership schools, and those across the city, in the new academic year.
In a small heavy saucepan over medium heat, combine sugar, butter, cream and salt. Bring to a boil and cook for 1 minute.
Natasha Romanoff: He killed 80 people in 2 days
The conference was organized by Kundra and Sen. Tom Carper (D-Del.) to address the future of cloud computing in the federal government.
1/2 teaspoon asafoetida
I tickled her right foot today and she laughed! She moved her right leg by herself- 2 inches off the bed!!
I was browsing the net and found this!
It's been a few days and I can't get the image out of my head. The things we go through for our hobby, huh?
Stasis Event
How many fires must I walk through
the perfect concoction of alkie hell.
I smile at this. Of course the bed always makes getting up extraordinarily difficult and I burrow deeper into its depths.
R6: *Sc 4, 2 sc in next sc*, rep 6 times. (36 sts)
The ceremony was lovely and filled with lots of smiles, laughs and happy tears. Afterwards we all headed over to the Largo Cultural Center and danced, ate & drank for about 6-7 hours (it was great). The evening ended perfectly with a dance-off & a bottle of champagne. We had a great time!
Oh, and here is a photo of the delicious pasta dinner I made, which was mentioned in my previous post. I think that tonight is the first time that I've ever eaten pasta without cheese!
I’ve seen people with worse flexibility than me, but there’s not too many of them around. And when I work with clients to improve their flexibility, I’m quick to point out how hypocritical I’m being since I am in fact incredibly inflexible.
*) Compel teachers and students to don Muslim garb to mark the end of Ramadan.
Yes, my Grandmother Lyda would serve up to four meat dishes and a groaning table of side items and desserts for Sunday dinner. As I think back, it amazes me, but I realize she was still in farm cooking mode, harkening back to the days when she would have a bunch of hungry men crowded around her table.
You’ll see the sun come shining through for you
I almost didn’t write this post for fear that she wouldn’t approve. I mean, she only recently became aware of my existence. What if she didn’t like me? What if she thought I was weird (which I totally am)? What if she thought I was her stalker? What if she KNEW I was her stalker and got a restraining order against me?
On the other hand, another reader (Ray from MN) noted in the comboxes that:
2110.***E-VII/11/2002. On the Pledge of Allegiance, divine providence, and the fortunes of the United States. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-31.)
Again, this is what passes for entertainment in my house.
I don’t typically like to share personal or sad stuff here at the blog because the blog is for featuring creativity and intended to be a fun place to visit. Having said that, I thought I’d share with you today that I’m struggling with a difficult time at the moment. My husband and I have decided that it’s time for us to put our beloved George to sleep. He’s 19 years old, and he’s lived a great and full life. Obviously, he’s very old for a dog, and his body is failing him. He’s got alzheimer’s and arthritis. The arthritis continues to worsen at an aggressive pace. We don’t want him to suffer.
a sunrise delight
swiss dots CB folder. I stamped the flowers and
God was enough when I confessed to my small group ending in “my heart is so ugly”, and they all laid hands on my head and chose to love me anyway. He was faithful in the Peanut placing her little hand on my head and patting. “Okay, mommy? Okay?” and “Jesus, Jesus, Amen.” I hope she never grows out of praying more Jesus over people. I have yet to run into a circumstance that wouldn’t be helped by more Jesus.
Tonight, Newscorpse called Mr Lorramoney’s suit ‘cynical and vindictive’. And in an unrelated instance of cynical vindictiveness, a Herr Alfrod Tatler of Linz, Vienna, told the Berlin Reichstag that he deplored the base decision by the Jew Franklin Roosevelt to declare war on the Greater German Reich “purely on the basis of a little unpleasantness in the Pearl Harbor area”.
Heather Sullivan a pediatric nurse from Woods Cross, Utah is using her experience working with children recovering from orthopedic and plastic surgery on her first volunteer mission with Project HOPE in Costa Rica and Guatemala.
All Muslims are not bad, but Islam unlike other religions IS POLITICALLY ACTIVE and unfortunately that is what we are seeing now today in England
While the pantywaist wuzzies of the coalition are tormenting themselves over whether to fly their masters' flag from public buildings (for the brief period left, when they still have a choice), 66 years ago, real men and real women had been celebrating the end of the war in Europe – with still the Japs to beat.
1. (a) State the prove time shifting property and frequency shifting property in Fourier transform.
Tuesday of the Fourth Week of Easter
Natural Birth is a bit of an odd term because it can mean anything from giving birth without any intervention at all to giving birth with all the drugs in the world, all the equipment but baby happens to come out vaginally rather than through the sunroof.
Believe it or not ‘tis the season to get your skin on show, but on closer inspection, after several months being kept under wraps it’s looking less than perfect. So, in my quest to summer smooth skin I have tried and tested five body brightening buffs – it’s a wonder I have any skin left.
I was at the theater last night following through with my bet. I bought the tickets, then stopped to get some popcorn and Diet Coke. While walking away I overheard/eavesdropped the man behind me saying:
Writing better, writing more quickly, writing focused on your message really pays dividends.
I decided to go with a Black & White theme for my *Doggy Sympathy* card. The brand new Set I'm using is actually called *Dog Sympathy*. The card was embellished with some Ruffled Lace Ribbon on the bottom, as well as the Black/White Gingham Ribbon on top, a little Flower Charm, a matching Black Button and some Black Scrapper's Floss. Of course not to forget the finishing touch are the Silver Pearls...voila!!! This design is simple and it will allow you to replicate in minutes.
Die cut shapes and frames - Spellbinders labels ten
The West Broward Bar Inaugural Golf Classic will be held May 12 at the Plantation Preserve Golf Course and Club (7050 W Broward Blvd., Plantation). The Classic will raise funds to buy computers and materials for the law students at Seminole Middle School.
Then the military bombs them and leaves them for dead without even checking to SEE if they’re dead or not – have I mentioned I’m not exactly enthralled with the way the military acts in this movie? – and we’re done, right? No? There’s still another ’1 year later’ epilogue scene? Oh come on, JUST END ALREADY, you big pile of green garbage!
It's worse for the locals, of course, but they are used to the unbelievable 30% inflation and doing without. It can come as a shock, though, to tourists traveling on the cheap to find that basic expenses can be the same as "back home." And luxury items and anything electronic are incredibly expensive.
Once when I crossed the swinging bridge to get the mail, I cautiously tip-toed up to the Dynamite House and peered inside, in the half-darkness I saw piled-up wooden boxes, the ones closest to the door half-filled with sawdust and round, brownish sticks that looked like giant candles. One glimpse, and I tip-toed away, then ran for my life,
Ink: SU Markers (Pear Pizzazz, Concord Crush)
we are at the hospital once again,
How does this apply to my blog post you ask? Well, we have lived in our house for 3 years now. A house that was supposed to be a 3 to 5 year house, has now turned into a 5 to 10 year house. Like most people, we are effected by this crazy economy and any chance of moving in the near future has vanished. Since this house was a "short term" house I didn't spend much time decorating it. I have purchased some things here and there. Did some projects here and there. But, mostly it is a hodge podge of things I have collected over the years, been graciously gifted and lots of hand me downs. You know how it is, you get married and you slowly by pieces that somehow have to fit with what you have because you are trying to make the mortgage by the hairs of your chinny chin chin.
One of the days, we went to the Georgetown Working League Fair. Georgetown is a tiny little town on an island on the coast and it's my love's hometown. There are about 1000 year-round residents. His family still lives there and we visit them every year. I love his family, the town, the state, the ocean - everything.
And were back with more Avocado Arts goodness today...quick post today, stilllllll fighting a cold!
Wow we now have a free ebook you can download. 7 smoothies for 7 days is an introduction to get you going on the smoothie journey. It was made in my kitchen with homemade photo’s as well. We do hope you enjoy and share it with your friends.
The story has enough meat to fit the action in with gusto. We have seen many mindless action flicks sink without a trace. Underworld Awakening might not be Oscar worthy story wise but it does have enough plot to suck the viewers in. You feel a bit for the characters and thats what makes the action sequences and “there are lots of it” interesting. The 3D technology used does elevate the effectiveness of the sequences but I felt that they were a bit dull in comparison to some of the more recent action flicks. The performances are just apt. Kate Beckinsale reprises her role of Selene and she knows exactly what to do with it. She has matured over the last three movie and her mannerism as well as looks now have a rugged splendor about it. She looks cool in the action sequences and does fairly enough in the dramatic moments. Stephen Rea is Wonderful. The rest are there just for the ride.
buds hold tight within themselves
Kinks You really got me UK
The judge made a Sexual Offences Prevention Order which bans Nawaz from contacting either victim and prevents him from unsupervised contact with any girl under 16.
What is most disturbing is that you have, and continue, to squander the opportunities that the people of this nation have placed into your hands. You appear to place Reelection to the Office, in which you are called to serve, above the interests of the people whose votes; sweat and treasure put you into that Office. Here is the truth regarding your much touted signing of DADT [that you have yet to enact]:
With Vladimir Putin returning to the Russian presidency, the prospect that he again would order an attack on Georgia as he did in August 2008 also has become a possibility, these informed sources say.
CHASING TROUBLE
Now add darkness to that experience. A profound blackness, relieved only by the small, narrow, pathetically yellowish cone of your hand-held light. Is that its natural wavelength or is it failing? Eek. No, it’s fine. I’m sure it’s fine and my fellow explorers are all close by with their (pathetic) lights if need be. And the bizarre landscapes and odd creatures begin to appear in my cone of vision.
Pitfalls
That’s very comforting.
Within a year, reports surface on various travel blogs about intense spells of déjà vu experienced by visitors to one or more of these buildings.
Sift all( except the marshmallows) ingredients together or place in food processor and blend well.
Book #72 of 2012
Besides versatile, pumpkins are an amazing source of vitamins and minerals too.
Today, Vermilion is having their first ever Fine Arts Fair at the Board of Education building from 4pm-7pm. The show will have:
I just wanted to share just as soon as I'd finished it, so here it is.
Marine 1st Lt. Clebe McClary
Then our garden, in what can only have been a planned act of sabotage, has decided to begin dying en-mass. A large topiary English box that sits prominently beside the new (handle-less) front doors has turned up toes. It is one of a pair, of course, and I have been assured by the nurseryman that I have absolutely no hope of finding a matching replacement. Meanwhile, five very large London Planes decided that they'd seen one gust of hot wind too many and promptly dropped dead. Farmer Joe and I have redirected part of the Christmas budget to replace three of the trees and are now spending each evening soaking the newcomers with a farm fire fighter unit - (as the nurseryman said "Remember, London's a swamp. You've gotta drown them!").
- more accurate and faster autofocus
On a positive note, the region’s second-worst performer in 2010 experienced a significant opening in 2011. The press freedom score for Burma improved from 94 to 85 points as the regime tentatively implemented political reforms.
CORRECTION--Warren is breathing 20 respirations per minute, NOT HOUR. So sorry about the typo. Was trying to type too fast!
For those amongst my subjects who dare to ask for more
Raquelle: You have so many wonderful photographs in your book. I especially love the one of your dad Harpo with yourself and your three siblings at Christmas time. You are all wearing big grins and look so happy to be together. How did you select which pictures to include and did these pictures come from your own collection or from other sources?
1 cup Duncan Hines Buttermilk Pancake Mix
Plenty of women write horror—it’s just packaged differently. Bad horror by men tends to be ultra-violent and sexist; bad horror by women tends to involve sexy werewolves and empowerment (but not the transgressive kind). The former gets called horror, the latter, paranormal romance. But there are plenty of men and women writing excellent horror right now, that transcends these clichés.
“Judge Not”
"I’m a born and raised California girl whose been transplanted to little ol’ Herriman, Utah. I’ve been married to my devastatingly handsome husband, Brett, for twenty years. We have three sassy children: Meagan-16, Madeline (Maddie)-14,
Number of hairpin turns: 36
Level 11: MP Cost: 30, Damage: 346%, Attacks up to 6 enemies.
All of this began here with Aliens. He still was creating a quality story backed by a few strong, solid actors, but he surely could’ve tightened it up in areas during scripting. Still, what irritates me when watching this film are many of the technical issues with visual effects, rear screen projection, the photography of the miniatures, and the poor choice of film stock. Furthermore, the poorly conceived Colonial Marines, aside from Hicks, are cartoonish buffoons that like to stroke their own egos instead of getting serious in a serious situation. These are all elements that make a substantial negative impact upon the film for me. It has plenty of good qualities to it from the strong lead performances and practical creature effects, but with a film so long, the negatives inevitably linger to repeatedly damage my enjoyment of the movie. Maybe, one day, I will watch the theatrical version and feel differently about that shorter cut, but if I was to judge this the way I intended, it had to be the director’s preferred version. This is an off occasion where I didn’t review the film for the sake of opening people’s eyes or rousing anyone’s interest. It really was just so I could deconstruct what always bothered me about this movie, and see the shortcomings that have prevented my full fledged enjoyment of it. I’m sure many would not perceive these same issues, but if everyone had the same point of view on everything, it would be a very uninteresting world.
Now is when I'm getting ready to bring beer to a few events. I have a co-worker going to Denver and he's got a bye bye party. I think I'll bring 10-15 gallons to that. He's expecting 50 people and that would hold a good chance of drinking everything I bring.
Long story short, TBC is a nice restaurant, and probably a lively night spot. And I will stop by again.
On our way to SM to record them boys of SJ~ We love telling them what to do lol~ have we got a song for you!!!
I swear I feel like this will be me. Not, by the way, because I am so special, but more because I am going to end up a DRIED UP HUSK trapped in a BOX. "Look! There's Aunt Karla! She's DEAD!"
Yet this year...this year...WE WALK!!
June 1, 1997.
“This is what you get when you play a world leader,” Streep said Saturday, hoisting up her best-actress Oscar for “The Iron Lady.”
“The year is 2312. Scientific and technological advances have opened gateways to an extraordinary future. Earth is no longer humanity’s only home; new habitats have been created throughout the solar system on moons, planets, and in between. But in this year, 2312, a sequence of events will force humanity to confront its past, its present, and its future.”
Previous Bondings 2.0 posts on the CDF-LCWR story (with some of the links each post contains):
Yep! That’s right. I’m on target, doing great, getting lots of stuff done. And now… I’m changing it all.
I’m baking some ice cream cone cupcakes for my friend’s daughter’s 3rd birthday tomorrow. I needed to find a way for my friend to transport the cupcakes up into the mountains and through the snow, without the cupcakes falling over.
I was tagged by Allison at Polka Dots and Paisley a few weeks ago but hadn't gotten to responding, yet. Sorry about that. FYI, we disconnected our internet at home since March 1st (will not be getting into it, it just had to be done), so I've only had internet at school for the last few weeks, and no extra time to do this thing.
Dawdlers are usually to be found at airports or train stations, or indeed any other location frequented by people in a hurry. Shopping centres on a Saturday afternoon are also a popular venue, and it is of course here that they can really spread out with shopping bags or other props to hinder a safe passage through to the car park before your ticket runs out.
“The unanimous decision in Commonwealth Court allows patrons to circumvent beer distributors where customers may only purchase beer by the case.”
lined it with some moss that was actually growing in my garden, but I've since used moss that you can
The camera card is now full – we’re not sure why; I was fairly sure I’d erased images after the last upload but they’re all still there, plus photos from tonight’s rowing presentations – but I managed just one image of Boy almost in the frame. Almost! It doesn’t matter whether he’s in it or not, really, because we can’t presently find a way to upload images directly from the camera. This is a hangover from the computer problems of earlier this year; there are still occasions where things don’t work and can’t be made to without much inconvenience to everyone.
Off to finish up the last article for today and then I'm going to practise this 'no' business by turning off my PC and ignoring my emails until tomorrow.
But in her life how did she offend you?
My friend Diana has a daughter named Naomi who loves owls. So when she asked me to make the cake for Naomi's 4th birthday party, I had to make an owl cake! Luckily for me, her husband designed an owl logo specifically for the birthday party (he also designs all the cards at their own stationery business, bumble ink!), so I used his logo as inspiration for the cake!
This year I also decided to make our Christmas cards. Last year I sent a photo card with some of our wedding pictures since we had just gotten married and our family and friends really liked it. I chose one picture from our recent trip to Costa Rica and went with a design I had made at a make-and-take at Scrapbook Buddies.
Traffic impacts: WIS 34 will remain open to traffic at all times with flagging operations. WIS 66 will remain open to through traffic until Monday, June 11. Motorists can expect to encounter flagging operations and delays. After June 11, WIS 66 will be closed to through traffic and detoured via WIS 34, Portage County P, and County HH (Old US 10). The highway will be closed at the four bridge replacement locations. Local access to residences and businesses will be maintained throughout construction.
Arslan's character and actions might be just as disconcerting for several. From the ceremonial rapist, Arslan moves away from the diabolical, warlord character toward something more nuanced and mystifying. His initial actions are unequivocally brutal (the rape, the rounding up of girls for a harem, the harsh martial law established in District 3281), but the bon homme that he is portrayed as being after the first third of the novel is much more seductive than assertive. It is, as he says about Hunt (and which could be applied to others), "after the rape comes the seduction." In his conversations with Franklin Bond, the principal of Kraft County's high school (and later the conflicted head of the Kraft County Resistance), Arslan comes across as being more and more reasonable, even as some of his actions (the injection of people worldwide with a sterility-inducing virus) are perhaps even more horrific than his first deeds, mitigated only by the distance (the world outside of Kraft County is shrouded in a fog of non-news) and reader sympathy with the root cause (the need to reduce human overpopulation). By the novel's concluding chapters, Engh's seduction of the reader's sympathies has been far advanced after the sudden rape of their sensibilities.
Warehousing & Storage Facilities
I would like to sincerely apologise for the short notice of an interruption in scheduling, but this will be my last post for a week or two. Unfortunately, there are two books that need to be written, and they're not, because someone is p-r-o-c-r-a-s-t-i-n-a-t-i-n-g. (Who said that?) I would offer the argument that I'm renovating. But there's no excuses for tardiness, so off I march to the literary coal mine again.
For previous Project Art Journal pages, please visit my sidebar and tag could.
Then it was on to the Canal Saint-Martin to meet JP and Kyoko for a bite. They’re taking a painting class (adorable) through the city and brought along their teacher, who’s half Belgian, half French, and every bit the bohemian artist. It was a nice dinner at Café Valmy: quirky, relaxed and very French. The perfect way to finish the week—my first week working in Paris.
But when we asked for reversion of rights, the response shocked us: if I would buy the considerable copies the publisher had sitting in their warehouse, they would revert the book. I have to tell you...it felt like coercion.
Double Bastard Ale: 10.5%
So it’s good to see that at the MEP level, our representatives are on the ball. During yesterday’s European Parliament session about the eurozone debt crisis, Jean-Charles Juncker, the president of the Eurogroup, allegedly told his audience, “We shouldn’t believe the markets”. His reward for this encouragement for everyone to stick fingers in their ears was, I’m reliably informed, a standing ovation.
This is the new Owl Medicine. We are not so lost as humans that we can't still be fascinated by our owl relatives. At the end of industrial civilization, how ironic that the only way we can view them is via high-tech computers and internet.
Oh my gosh....what day is it?!?! Sorry for the late post. I had a few fires to put out yesterday.....Tuesdays just seem to be that way....maybe I should change my class release dates to Wednesdays!!
Here are some pics from Tulum. It's also pretty neat and right next to the ocean. I'd been here before when Lis and I went on a cruise so it was fun to see it again.
The boys' appetites have grown this summer, so I was delighted to find an array of loose buns at the grocery store. These have simplified the kids lunch making. They are cheaper than baguette, do not need pre-ordering, and are pre-cut by Scott, making it easier for the boys to prepare them. Best of all, the serving size satisfies Max's appetite perfectly.
“Some villagers reported that more than one US soldier was involved,” wrote Emma Graham-Harrison, The Guardian‘s Kabul-based correspondent, “but Afghan officials and the NATO-led coalition said they believed the killer worked alone.”
I have a closeup of the samgyeopsal. Samgyeopsal is fatty pork belly, SOO GOOD. My grandma says that all the fat has been drained out from steaming it (really?!), and I believe it (really!?), so my chopsticks keep on reaching out for them and I end up eating way too much. But so delicious, you won’t complain.
I did get together one afternoon, with a former boss. We stayed in touch after my temp job was over, he was smart, and funny. We e-mailed about little things. One day, he asked me for coffee, just on the spur of the moment. I went - it didn't feel like a date. I was open to dating, but this just felt like... hanging out. We had good conversation, we laughed... and he never, ever e-mailed me again, nor did he answer mine. OK - I saw the Sex & the City episode and read the book - He Just Wasn't That Into Me, I can handle it. But it was weird.
Round 6 (180)
3. Don’t eat after 7 P.M.
Though we've tried to stand strong
Terrorized - by any chance do you even know what that word means? Terrorize? Really? How? Do we blow up their buses? Their malls? They restaurants - not a one you can think of, right? But hey, there go those pesky little facts. Ah, your tax payer dollars...well, good news for you, I guess if Obama gets re-elected, right?
Even though it was sudden, I'm glad it happened this way. I didn't have time to feel completely anxious for days. However, I felt complete anxiety on the way to the Gladney office. It's all very emotional - I can't even imagine how these amazing women feel.
Just as I wished I could call Coleman to remind him (my son who also loves these celestial events), the phone rang. I ran inside, and it was him, calling to tell me! We hung up quickly so we could stay present to what was happening. I walked back outside to the apple trees beneath my kitchen window, the place where so much seems to happen, and got still, very still for a few minutes. As I stood there quietly watching the changing face of the moon, I recalled a Camus quote I had written in a notebook a few nights ago:
Here is my final scene, with hearts drawn by blobbing two drop-shapes from the super brush and tracing around them. I used Y15, YR04 for the ducks and R83 for the hearts. Perfect for a quick baby card or an Easter scene. I hope you try this super-easy technique for yourself. Think about what other shapes you can doodle in this manner. Try adding wings sticking out or drawing smiles on the beaks. The creativity is limitless. People will think you are so talented that you can draw such cute little ducks, but you'll know the secret of how simple these really are to make.
Though, yeah, even the astrologers say that May and June of this year are difficult months for the USA.
I walked the sweet old town streets, window shopped, stopped and chatted to shop owners. I love exploring this way!
There are a few different varieties of the Uni Alpha Gel mechanical pencil – originals, slimlines, shakers, etc. I never planned on getting one because they aren’t available in my part of the world and their main feature is a large squishy gel grip…something I am not usually enamoured with. But in a very polite way Isu from Japan frequently asked me if I had a Uni Alpha Gel, and did I know “...its gel grip is the exact same consistency as Haribo Gummi Bears?” Well, I hadn’t ever heard of Haribo Gummi Bears, obviously another thing we don’t have down my way, but Isu’s sweet tooth got to me and eventually I ordered an Alpha Gel mechanical pencil. A Uni Alpha Gel HD Shaka Shaka M5-618GG 1P chrome green mechanical pencil to be precise.
There is no such thing as a throwaway character, and even the most simplistic of personalities are rendered three-dimensional by the passage of time – think of Peter’s campaign manager Eli Gold (brilliantly played by Alan Cumming), a man solely driven by a desire to win but necessarily balancing this with a teenage daughter and a similarly ambitious ex-wife. Characters are often dropped for weeks, months, or in some cases years at a time before resurfacing as important players in an increasingly fractured and fulsome Chicagoan legal-political community.
In no time, I had a drawer of three tiny piles of underwear, all neatly folded like envelopes. This was more than just satisfying. A tiny chasm opened in my soul and peace began to trickle in. I felt lighter.
And so we end our happy story with a questionnaire. Do you live near a North American city? Do you eat food? Are you a human? If the answer is yes to all three questions, congratulations! A Kinfolk dinner might coming to a city near you. Check for updates here. Or even better yet -and I'm going to take my own advice here- organize a simple dinner party with a few close friends, like, SOON. It doesn't have to be an elaborate affair; a bottle of wine, a thrown-together salad and some candlelight is enough to make the indignities of the workweek evaporate as the company of friends fills us with joy and gratitude.
I painted the rings with metallic gold acrylic paint & sealed with Krylon Preserve It.
Damn... now I feel like cookies and a coffee.
Cream butter and the cup of sugar; add well-beaten eggs, then milk, vanilla, flour, salt, and baking powder. Refrigerate for at least 1 hour. Roll dough, cut into trefoil shapes, and sprinkle sugar on top, if desired. Bake in a quick oven (375°) for approximately 8 to 10 minutes or until the edges begin to brown. Makes six- to seven-dozen cookies.
Vocal Warm-ups. We sang Me-balaba You-balaba Me-balaba and Mommy Made Me Mash My M&Ms. And we're not explaining. And we're not sorry.
Trying to integrate into the system won't work. Approval from the system is fleeting or false. The ONLY thing that will protect parents, home birth and authentic midwifery is to be sure that parents' rights are acknowledged and respected.
I got another batch of diapers ordered and will be organizing them all soon! We honestly don't have too much to do to prepare for your arrival so Mommy has decided to feed her nesting desires by purging the house a bit! I am starting to fill an area of the basement with stuff for a garage sale I will have at the end of August! This way if you do indeed turn out to be a boy like Daddy and others seem to think I can sell off a ton of girl clothing at the sale too!
As for bulbs, some recommend special grow lights or full spectrum florescent bulbs, but a standard florescent bulb should work fine as well. It's not like your seedlings are going to live out their lives under the light. You just need it until they're large enough to transplant when the weather is accommodating. I chose to use Philips Natural Sunshine bulbs. I'm sure I could have used a cheaper bulb, and I'm not sure if I gained anything by going with "natural sunshine", but my seedlings are very happy!
1999 In an historic vote, electors in Scotland and Wales went to the polls to chose their representatives for the newly-devolved Scottish Parliament and Welsh Assembly.
The very thought of it grated on Wei Tsu Tin. There was no denying it, his new command was a definite demotion. In his heart, Wei knew that he bore the responsibility for the massacre of his men in Arizona. As any good PLA general would do, Wei had deflected the blame. He’d had poor intelligence. His men were too lightly armed and poorly trained. They were weak and sickly. Wei had a dozen reasons for his numerous defeats in Arizona.
That's another thing I've been thinking about lately. God has reminded me that He does and will provide. With a few Christian friends leaving the area for various reasons, I've been wondering how I'm going to manage. God, ever-faithful, has reminded me of a time a few short years ago when I felt the same way. Just the fact that here I am again shows that He did provide for me, which is comforting to know that He can do it again.
The item presents any range of useful characteristics in a handset calibrating 109x 60x 13.9 mm thick and coming in at simply 104 g.
2. In 150 words, describe the place where you are right now.
The rest of the times im at home just hanging out and watching reality tv or something :P, or hanging out with my husband, sisters and family , in the weekends or every friday night i usually go out with my husband for dinner and something weird like diving or water ski or something (jet skis are a lot of fun for anyone who likes water).
Egg yolk spilled across the sky three minutes earlier this morning, pooling over metallic blue in patches. As I trudge forward, sand screws up to my knees during long gusts to remind me that even in the desert I am not alone in waking. This is not a spiritual quest; this is not a nightmare, for that implies brevity. This is a purposeful challenge to that slobbering, scrap-iron pig, Death.
For his birthday party at preschool, I made my go-to cupcake ... a chocolate cupcake with chocolate cream cheese frosting. Last year I made him "elmo" cupcakes, and this year when I asked what kind of cupcakes he wanted, he chose "cars". (Well, actually first he wanted "spiderman" cupcakes. Then he wanted "star wars" cupcakes. Finally he wanted "cars". Good thing he didn't change his mind again!)
I’m also older. Never one to enjoy crowds and schmoozing, this year I was officially wearing my “old fuddy-duddy” attitude. Gone are the days I’d spend the midnight hour watching a poorly dubbed anime film hosted in a small hotel conference room followed by filk singing into the wee hours of the morning. Last week it was all about hitting the parties early to scarf up the free food and drinks and getting back to the hotel room by 8 or 9 pm to check stats and chat with online friends.
10. Quality time with my daughter
And don’t forget to stop me and say hi -- I’ll tell you why I’ve been MIA for the last month -- you’re gonna love the new app I’ve been working on. Whoops, did I say too much?
And what is the role of government in making us feel at home? Is a government that supports immigrant integration actually doing something to make us feel like we belong?
But one resident who said she had been approached for her signature by Mr Whitby said: “He never told me (he was BNP). That’s deception.
*Don't ask. The variant was PPGs, Pregnancy Prevention Glasses. Like LPCs, Leather Personel Carriers - boots.
3. It’s farfalla in Italian, mariposa in Spanish and papillon in French – what is it in English?
And, baby bunnies.
What I particularly enjoyed about RR was the worldbuilding. We don’t get a whole lot of it, necessarily, but what we do get is extremely well done. Between the religions, the parasites, and the history of Elei’s world, we get something unique that beckons us to return to it.
Always a delight to receive the thoughtful observations of a principled reader such as yourself.
So if you need a quick fix for your shades try
From the ground, the pattern of the mist is harder to discern, but from 3,000 feet, it’s beautiful to watch it steaming off waterways in the cool morning air, spreading like a threadbare cotton blanket over the ground, or catching long shadows from the sun low on the horizon.
but may take a few minutes to read….
As we celebrate a day that commemorates a revolution against tyranny, perhaps we can spend a moment or two thinking about all the Americans who this month will lose their battle to pay the rent.
“Sullivan seems able to do almost anything, to work in any register, and not just within a single piece but often in the span of a single paragraph…Pulphead is the best, and most important, collection of magazine writing since Wallace’s A Supposedly Fun Thing I’ll Never Do Again…Sullivan’s writing is a bizarrely coherent, novel, and generous pastiche of the biblical, the demotic, the regionally gusty and the erudite.” —Gideon Lewis-Kraus, New York Times Book Review
Park rangers are typically passionate and knowledgeable about the great outdoors and eager to share their love for nature's bounty and to answer questions. I often enjoyed evening campfire programs with slide shows given at many of the national parks I visited.
What changed my mind? (and yeah...I ended up changing my blog name if you didn't notice.)
We celebrated Gi's birthday Sunday. I am so happy that she is on the road to recovery after her back surgery. Watch out Lakeside . . . you have a new "walker" on your hands :)
And stamp them on your brain,
These are some of the books that I reach for at this carefree time of the year.
The IPKat notes that Helmet did not appear to press any argument based on the misuse by Tunnard of any confidential information or privileged access to commercial or technical data. This being so, it was forced to rely on a duty of fidelity and a fiduciary duty - both being duties that the Courts appear unwilling to find to exist where (i) the party relying on them had the opportunity to stipulate its requirements in writing but failed to do so and (ii) enforcement of such a duty would be tantamount to a bar on competition or a restraint of trade. Merpel says, although this looks like a case where prudent drafting would have protected the ex-employer, it's also an instance where prudent drafting would have helped the ex-employee too - it's a classical situation in which the aggrieved former employer will sue even though the outcome is uncertain-to-poor, if only to deter other employees from doing the same thing.
“My grace is sufficient for you, for My strength is made perfect in weakness.” - God!
At home, I've made Buffalo Seitan before but since I'm eating a gluten-free diet, I needed to find another way to satisfy my Buffalo Sauce craving. These Buffalo Fries are made with tofu. I call them "fries" because I cut the tofu into french fry shapes and because it sounds a lot better than "wings" (and I don't want to do the whole misspelling-the-word-so-it's-not-a-real-animal-part thing. Wyngz? Really? I don't think so).
The Muppet Telethon is pretty entertaining, containing humorous skits, but they fall short of their goal, and leave the theater having lost out to Richman. Outside, however, a huge crowd has gathered to welcome the Muppets back into the public consciousness. When they fell short of reaching their goal, there’s a sense of real disappointment, but when Kermit tells the gathered Muppets that they tried and that what’s important … it’s an incredibly touching scene.
But there’s more to being a helper than that. There’s the duties of a wife and mother. Marriage today is an enormous risk and responsibility for a man. The way to persuade a man to marry is to show him that you have studied his concerns, that his concerns are actually much worse than he knows, and that you have solutions to all of his problems. Show him that you have studied these things in detail, that you have written about these concerns passionately in public, and that you are serious about solving them. If you can’t solve the problems, (e.g. – hate crime bills, taxes for public schools), then show him that you are informed about these issues, on his side, and have at least spoken or written passionately about it somewhere public.
Even now, though, it is difficult to come to term with the sheer scale of this cash grab, or the extent to which councils have become reliant on fees and charges, and "other sources" to augment their traditional sources of income.
“No. I been to two more machines, waiting for you.”
with happiness,
2) one all-purpose dress that will work for both Christmas Lessons and Carols at the American Cathedral and zippity-splashy for New Year's eve (I learned the hard -embarrassing - way that that le Reveillon is the one event that is never casual in Paris.)
If you don't have the space for a dedicated toy room, you can still use these ideas to keep the clutter…I mean toys in their place.
The next morning, it looked like a massacre! Or so I was told, I am fortunate enough to not have seen it. My amazing husband cleaned it all up before I got up. He let me sleep in, after a hard night with Serenity, and came down to clean up the mess.
This is an album to be savored – one that takes many repeated listens to fully appreciate the musical intricacies. The quality of musicianship rivals anything that is on the indie scene these days. While some of the Ryan-led tracks do sound somewhat similar, one of Town Hall’s greatest assets is their ability to never “sit still” within a song. They move gracefully from verse to verse, all the while weaving in and out of catchy riffs and fills without it feeling jumpy or disconnected.
October 7, 2010
I cannot penetrate
So it is written… let’s see how this goes!
Today I ran across Thomas The Tank Engine and remembered fondly the backdrop of the rolling hills, windmills, water wheels, and tiny towns in which Thomas and friends chugged through.
loos included.
The first is “I am with you”, the second is “grow up”.
I feel like that at some point, I should be able to put away my childlike things and behave like an adult. If you’ve read any other posts in this blog, you’ll know that I don’t really want to be an adult, and I covet those moments when I can recapture some bits of childlike innocence in play or thought. Maybe, in fact, this ”dissimulation, half answers, vindictive attitudes, a false presentation of self” is really adult behavior. Maybe this is what happens to us when we become adults: we get mean. I don’t know many children who behave as badly as many of the adults I know.
and your spirit is downcast and low.
2 avoid
During the 1950s and 1960s Powell appeared regularly on television. These credits included guest spots on nearly all the major variety shows of the period such as Perry Como, The Andy Williams Show, The Kraft Music Hall, Frank Sinatra, The Ed Sullivan Show, The Hollywood Palace, The Red Skelton Show, Eddie Fisher, The Dinah Shore Show, The Dean Martin Show, The Smothers Brothers, Jonathan Winters, This is Tom Jones, The Garry Moore Show, The Jerry Lewis Show and The Judy Garland Show. She did a stint as one of the What’s My Line? Mystery Guests on the popular Sunday night CBS-TV programme. She also appeared as guest panelist on the same show. TV specials included “Meet Me in St. Louis”, “Young at Heart”, “Feathertop”, “Danny Thomas Show 1967″, “Victor Borge Show”, “Ruggles of Red Gap” on Producers’ Showcase and “Hooray for Love”. Dramatic guest spots included both The Dick Powell Show and The June Allyson Show. She also had a failed TV pilot for a sitcom called “The Jane Powell Show”. Powell was also a regular guest on TV variety shows in Australia when she visited there to perform her nightclub act. She also had a one-off TV special in that country in 1964.
· Popcorn
Ben wrote:
4. What are the three colours on the French flag?
I don't think it's still available now, but it's a good experience to remember. I was alerted to the app within a few days of it going online, so also remember that the quilting industry might be big, but it's also very small too and if something happens like this you'll usually know about it within a short time.
Green Mt. up and down Amp-Gman. Snappy 35:15 ascent and THREE bear sightings! The first was a small black bear on lower Greenman who promptly went crashing into the underbrush. The second and third were when I was coming down on Saddle Rock below the spring and just above the first rock outcropping. They were hanging out in the drainage to the west and both were quite large, one black and the other tinted more with brown. They seemed only mildly anxious and eventually ambled off into the woods up towards the Saddle Rock itself.
Records show Wiles was caught during a burglary by Mark Klima, the straight-A son of the family for whom Wiles had been a farmhand. Wiles stabbed Klima repeatedly with a kitchen knife until he stopped moving, the knife left buried in his victim’s back.
As to derivation, the similarities between the Cash Call proposals and Have a Go were insufficient to create an inference of copying: the similarities were general and related to features that were commonplace in the TV game-show arena and at a high level of abstraction. After applying the same analysis of the works' similarities, the judge also concluded that Meakin had no real prospect of proving reproduction of a substantial part of his work.
Across the Kafue river from Kitwe and just a little downstream there stands a tall, old, elegant home on a large rock, literally IN the river! This is the successor to Grey Stone Cottage, a retreat built in the early ‘40s by Charles Fischer, a doctor in the young mining town of Kitwe. Charles’ son, Mike, now lives on the beautiful Grey Stone farm, home to impala, puku, bushbuck, zebra, eland and all sorts of other game. We enjoyed two lovely nights with Mike and Jan, their 4 dogs and Georgie, the tame ground hornbill. Georgie had an uncanny ability to quietly and nonchalantly stand by, seemingly in her own world when – WHAM! A short peck to your shin or toes would remind you of her presence. Georgie loves her walks, trotting along amongst the dogs happily.
America waits till Germany is about to fall over from sustained punching from Britain and France, then walks over and smashes it with a barstool, then pretends it won the fight all by itself.
I am so glad that I have the best earthly mother and the best heavenly mother in all the universe! I don’t know what I would do without them!
What sets him apart from his contempories however was his passion for gothic art. He was employed by the city of Paris from 1860 to 1876, a time when revolution was in the air. Indeed, the Prussian invasion and the Commune uprising occurred in 1871, and his rebuilding of the Hotel de Ville came after the original building had been burnt down by the Communards. At a time when people were turning their backs on religion and the state, and Haussmann was ripping the medieval heart out of the city, Ballu was erecting buildings that were heavy with sculpture, Byzantine domes and Romanesque arches. Whilst Haussmann was creating broad new perspectives throughout the city, Ballu was constructing the single lean tower of the Trinité church which mirrors the perspective of the Rue Chausée d’Antin, a narrow ancient street.
When 25p was decent pocket money
Having seen some pretty amazing pictures on Ravelry, where a whole thread is devoted to the colour variations obtained with black beans, I have wanted to experiment with those for a few months now. So I was particularly eager to try them out in our dyeing experiments in France.
Beyond the coming darkness,
60 - 6.51 - Jacoby Ford, Clemson - '09
Lenten/Passiontide read-alouds:
* What made you think ‘I want to write for kids?’ Is it a genre you enjoy reading?
and it sat at the edge of my block.
The Board found that the mark "fails to create an association with the goods and fails to serve as an indicator of source of applicant's goods as described on the webpage." The mark is distant from the description of the software and separated by text of marginal relevance (e.g., Applicant's philosophy regarding customers). Moreover, a number of different logos appear on the webpage that do not relate to the software. Links to event and news further distract the reader from the mark.
And mine were worthily despised;
03. Erna (4:06)
Guinsoo: Okay…
At the Cloverdale Library in Surrey, BC, I talked to the librarian about the Upper and Lower Canadian Land Petitions at the LAC website. We decided that the dates cut off before Archibald McDonell and that I was going to have to call them on their toll-free number and dig deeper. I turned to pulling books off the shelf and reviewed them. They had the Lochiel Parish book and St. Regis in three volumes. These are of course, regarding my McDonell line and I describe what I was doing in the Boardman and Brown blog. So go and check it out at: http://boardmanbrown.wordpress.com/
Peter Gowlland, 78, was due to meet with Barry Goodwin, acting Archdeacon of Croydon, on St George’s Day for his Reader’s licence to be renewed for a further year. To his surprise, he was presented with some nebulous charges (with no prior warning) which concerned an incident eight days earlier, when he dared to suggest that the congregation at All Saints might like to sign the Coalition for Marriage petition. He had been preaching about the boldness of the Apostles, and told the congregation that the C4M issue called for a contemporary manifestation of like boldness.
Maybe we’re just not as vocal as some.
Bags of sweet potatoes are $1.79 (I think.) That is practically FREE, you guys. Roast them whole on a baking sheet, or slice them and make them into oven “fries”, or mash them and add things like cinnamon, vanilla, a squeeze of lime or orange juice, sea salt – WHATEVER. This is a bag of sweet potatoes, roasted, peeled, then mashed and awaiting their fate in my fridge:
Husband told me I could order shoes if I wanted…
